this is a bit reductive. there are plenty of both types on both sides...
couldn't they test it in other countries?
If you ask the refugees that came over here they would tell you they rather live in their own native countries and would return asap if things settled down. 
Dear Lord. I never wanted to eat cat before now.
Thank you!!
Exactly this.  The military aren't just going to let anyone buy a rail gun.  You'd likely have three avenues of acquiring one: from a derelict Idris that you can salvage an undamaged part from, from the UEE or from a very high end illegal arms dealer.
What makes the Thrunite better besides the 1100 lumens? I'm not guru and am generally curious why it is recommended here more by most people?
I logged 600 hrs on this game and haven't played since 2.2. Maybe other games are more fun or I don't have as much time but these new posts do make me feel nostalgic for the first 20-50 hrs of the game. 
It means that O2 doesn't end up stunned in a lot of WCs that I do. Maybe he does and I just don't notice, but I'm pretty sure he does not end up stunned for the majority of the fight. I'm autistic, not blind. 
Being high on weed honestly made it super worse for me. Maybe like x2. But the nice thing was that I didn't give a shit.
Holder is up at 3 A.M. because, for some reason, he can't sleep. Comey, too. Rats are up nights also.
They put out Jeremy's EP last year too
The Nexus is 'Nigerian'.
I thought something with fish or reptile scales would be interesting. I like wood too.
I'm currently vaping on a new flavor I picked up recently, Electric Forest by Vapejoose and it's pretty tasty.  Monkey Nuts sounds pretty good, I'll have to pick up some of that to try sometime.
http://i.imgur.com/uh7Ed02.jpg  Hello
Aren't you a Warriors fan? Or am I tripping? 
wow one of the best diplos I've ever seen where did you find it ? PC or PS4 ? Mods ?
I'm telling you. He warned us about this and pretty much said "Don't worry Dub nation. The storm is coming but it's a process that has to happen. "
Thank you. How wrong am I to imagine the universe as a probabilistic cell automata?
Will, I kinda explained exactly how she did it, do I wouldn't be surprised.
Most likely only a temporary boost like all the other COD games on PC.
You watch the Project Veritas videos on CNN? Fake News.
This. I've had a balance with Guitar Center more months than not for years and have paid zero interest because I make sure each item gets paid off within the 0% time frame.
#KID
Is gnostic a-fairyism hypocritical?   I say I "know" that there are no gods with the same degree of certainty and for all the same reasons that I saw I "know" there are no goblins, pixies, elves or giants. And I doubt anyone would fault me for saying that I "know" none of those things exist.   God claims are indistinguishable from these claims in every meaningful aspect. The only reason we try and brand gnostic atheism as an untenable position is because of the cultural conditioning attached to religious beliefs, and the undeserved pedestal that religion gets; often, even from believers. Neither religion, nor religious thought, involves any deeper thinking or more justification than the belief in hobgoblins, once you peel away all the woo and deepisms. Why, then, is it somehow wrong for me to say that I "know" no gods exist? &gt;it doesn't make sense to claim god doesn't exist when we have no real evidence against god either.   The fact that every single god ever posited is evidently a man-made construct **is** evidence against gods.
Thanks! I'll do some hunting this weekend. 
The new replacement should allow you to use the LGS with out any issues? I just turn all RGBs off for battery life.
Hi :)  I went to the chemistry/pharmacy to get medications for mine near the ankle =_=' (the girl working there is even a nurse and can do the service) You could  go to the gp! If it's an ingrown hair they just need to gently dig a way out for that hair that went bananas.  Have you already disinfected it anyway?
In *attack* of the Mercy, she was probably just hoping for those sweet, sweet unbalanced SR granted to Mercys who get a decent rez off.  Hissssssss.
SECTION | CONTENT :--|:-- Title | FORTNITE MORE SKINS/CARDS !! BASKETBALL SKIN !! FORTNITE Description | ● FORTNITE MORE SKINS !! BASKETBALL SKIN !! FORTNITE  ● How was that video FaithArmy! If you enjoyed, make sure you land on that like button and remember "If you truly believe, you will succeed" KF  ● Outro Lyrics By TuRaw ● Outro Song by Omito - https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=evV2Q-bsLps ● Intro Song (Arman Cekin - California Dreaming (ft. Paul Rey) - https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=TpJHlRvaxm4  🔶 Verse Of The Day 🔶"For by him were all things created, that are in heaven, and that are in earth,... Length | 0:06:48     ****   ^(I am a bot, this is an auto-generated reply | )^[Info](https://www.reddit.com/u/video_descriptionbot) ^| ^[Feedback](https://www.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=video_descriptionbot&amp;subject=Feedback) ^| ^(Reply STOP to opt out permanently)
Look at that road they live on on the map.... And they ride that monstrosity.
Saw them there on the kid a tour back in 2000 :D
There's a brewery on the main strip, opposite the information centre.  Alternatively, I remember mud wrestling in a pub opposite Base Backpackers one time?  There was also one set back slightly from the lake... honestly mate, I've only been drinking in Taupo once and it was dark and I was drunk so my memory is quite specifically shit.
rad as hell
Your submission was automatically removed because i.redd.it is not an approved host. We currently only allow direct image links from imgur (i.imgur.com) due to spam in regular imgur post descriptions. Refer to [this post](https://www.reddit.com/r/TinderNSFW/comments/3r9gdu/due_to_spam_we_are_restricting_links_to_iimgurcom/) first if you have any issues making a new post. If this removal was an error or you have a question regarding this new rule you can [message the mods](https://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2FTinderNSFW).  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/TinderNSFW) if you have any questions or concerns.*
That you for pointing this out. I can't seem to find anything from /u/possiblywrong would you mind walking me through how you did it?
Yeah, now that I'm looking at it again, I see a zombie in that area with the more shallow water.
I thought this was a ballsy post on a non-throwaway until i was proven wrong. Nice one.
I feel like Deshaan is underrated, the main questline in Deshaan is very well structured and engaging, and has a satisfying length to it with an epic showdown with the antagonist of the zone. I find that the Ebonheart pact has some of the best and worst zones in the game. Best being (in my opinion): Stonefalls and Deshaan, but also the worst in (in my opinion): Eastmarch and The Rift. The Dunmer pact zones are absolutely stunning visual wise and The Rift as lackluster as it is has a beautiful autumn theme. Shadowfen is a swamp and is "meh" visual wise, the Argonian architecture however does provide a unique flavor.   The Dominion is very floral and elegant when it comes to the cherry blossom covered Auridon and Altmer architecture adds loads of character to its settlements. Grahtwood is captivating with its sprawling gigantic trees, and there is tons to do in the zone, but the mystical "big trees everywhere" motif wore off in a hasty fashion, and I just got sick off it. Greenshade is very savanna like and offers a slightly modified flavor, and has much better quests than Grahtwood, but still similar enough to Grahtwood to leave me yearning for differents visuals. Malabal Tor just made me sick to my stomach, it's a swampy Grahtwood essentially and I was just ready to vomit at the sight of another fucking tree, the quests are good, but the visuals are the damned same, leaving this zone wanting. Reaper's March was a breath of fresh air where we finally get some Khajiit flavor (this was great especially when we had 3 Bosmer zones in a row). Reaper's March had great quests and the previously mentioned Khajiit flavor was refreshing.   The Daggerfall Covenant is a mixed bag, Glenumbra is painfully bland, unimaginative, and generic, and the lackluster quests didn't help one bit. Stormhaven was okay, a step above Glenumbra, and Wayrest is beautiful, but still no where near the best, quests didn't feel that engaging. Rivenspire is amazing. The withered crag visual was executed very well, and the quests are okay as well. The Alik'r Desert is nice Redguard flavor, and the Yokudan structures are majestic to say the least, quests were nice. Bangkorai is an interesting combination of Breton and Redguard geography, nice area.   Overall, I feel like Ebonheart Pact is the strongest, followed by The Covenant, then the Dominion (the Dominion would definitely stomp the covenant if it wasn't for the fact that the zones would have you believe the Dominion is a Bosmer only organization)   
Could you also do the opposite and have the boss on focus and your dps spells hit focus target so you can just click and heal people at will?  
Major success. Don't think they could have done it better
/r/gifsthatstarttoolate
If they do you'll have Trump to blame. 
Hi! The only trustworthy way to secure a place to stay from your country (or even from here, why not?) is to do it through online housing agencies. They cost you a fee, but considering the the living costs of the city you save up money in the long run.   Hostingpower and spotahome are two examples. They are both legit. However, the former only offers accomodation solutions in houses that owner occupied, the latter instead has both owner and non-owner occupied houses (mostly the second).   Hostingpower is great for students as most of the houses are around the universities, but, again, you would need to be OK with not living in a students house where you party and stuff like that. I am actually living in a house booked through this service right now, and I am liking it. I pay 480 for a single room with double bed, and I am 40 mins walk from the center. (they offer only single rooms and an all inclusive formula with expenses and wifi, and bed linen included).  Seems like an advertisement, but I feel you and it's really not worth it to get involved in the crazyness of househunting in dublin! it is not worth it and plus you waste a lot of money in hostels. I heard you could go on for months.  Just so you know, you only have to give one week notice with hostingpower, so if at some point you find your dreamhouse you can always leave. No deposit and payments are on a weekly basis.  Source: my experience of househunting from abroad
I'll make a habit of doing that :)
AninhaGame0203
:(
Fair.  I just wanted to know if I could have a taste or not.  I bought it for my boyfriend, not for me.
Yeah, I've got 140k one owner miles on my bag of shit with no major mechanical problems, and I beat the shit out of it regularly on the Colorado trails. The specs on it are superior to the same year 4runner in prety much every regard. I like 4runners, don't get me wrong, but I haven't once wished I had one instead of my X.
Ghost on the throne is a good and relatively quick read about the death of Alexander and the fracturing of his generals 
She literally aces Novak twice  https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Lf6G4Um_YXo
This looks exactly like my room in hamtramck, Michigan.
&gt; So, how did someone get access to your userid, password AND computer?  You're really overthinking this.  If they weren't at his computer, they'd normally just get asked an extra security question, nothing more.  If they already had his username and password, it's not a big stretch to assume they knew the answer to whatever measley security questions the bank uses.
Omg Paul and Dom are a thing (alliance-wise)?? Didn't see that coming!
I find that using a good Wii to HDMI (the Sewell one from Amazon, for example) is pretty helpful. 
I got it from iron/steel dragons while i was hunting for rune limbs. Just post mage prot and mage with t40+.
I deffo think it's possible to raise it up in two months but its moreso about the effort you know. Time the time to make sure you have important concepts in chem/phys down. Know those equations and your units like the back of your hand. Live on K.A. Spend time on your weak areas it's the difference between an eh score and a breathtaking score. 
Lol dude what's the worst that can happen. A girl says no?   I've had girls laugh in my face and they weren't even that pretty and i've had hot chicks naked on the first date.   Rejection happens. Don't try to force asking every girl you talk to out.   Let the asking out come natural. Start conversation if it goes well ask her out. If it stays mostly friendly say you're goodbye and head out. 
Thank you very much. I can sometimes be shy (yes, even online) and scared to put myself out there. The tough part is breaking past that reservation and letting that shiny personality break through
The only apple product I have is an ipad but every single thing I've tried to use it for has been a pain in the ass.  Why the fuck do I have to install itunes just to get media files loaded onto it so that the app that recognizes them will actually open them. I guess if all you want is to use shit that's built into apple's ecosystem it works but otherwise it is certainly not easy to use.  To get things on my android phone I don't even have to plug it into my computer I can just copy them over the network into whatever directory I want and open them straight way.
Are you fucking kidding me Estrada??? 
Everyone says he'll be expensive but there's only a small amount of teams looking for a starting PG and there's already several PGs better than Teague. Lowry, Hill, Jrue potentially, Mills.
The pouch has a belt loop on it so you can slip it on and rest your arms should they weaken under the strain of excessive firepower. 
Y
Hey Pete walker your pitcher just walked 3 in a row you wanna get out there bud
That font choice and color is atrocious. 
Oh, cheer up you old sod.
I have exactly the same question. I like oled and great battery, but the lack of headphone port and huge size are downsides of the Z Play
Returned to trailer and story, respawned online as Michael, swapped vehicle slots, and then found new session
Didn't feel like there was a lot of follow up for each other while c9 had better team fight and we had a 1-4 comp and lost baron. It would have been different with baron. Sven had an awesome game on Elise in the beginning too, in happy for that.
Is that what happened to his nose?
Destroyed mailbox and fled? Is that considered a federal crime since a mailbox was involved?
So the CSGO version of Kkoma facepalm?
Median household income is over $50000 a year.
Or, by the end of this year.
He's going to walk everyone 
Nvm got it.
Curious. I can wear polarized sunglasses and not have issues with my ip7 vertically or horizontally. 
That game wasn't even close to lousy.
Wow, that's nice of you mate! would you mind if I pm'd you?
Agreed. But I see three downsides:  (1) The lighthouses cost money  (2) The lighthouses need to be setup  (3) The lighthouses cannot be used outdoors or in environments with strong infrared noise
Crickets
Oc: brb
They're inch measurements. 30/32 being a thirty inch waist and a 32 inch inseam.
Oh my God... you're fucking evil...   I love it 
It's the color for awareness for the condition Raven has. They're all wearing it today in support. 
VR in both is my only way to play. VR is what got me hooked on both ATS and ETS2, which is awesome on multiple levels because I would have missed out on a totally excellent game series otherwise.  VR Truck Simming is totally worth it if you like either VR or SCS's games.  If you like both, it's a no brainer.   I'd be happy to tell you anything you want to know about it. Go ahead. AMA!
Dark Paladin Series by Vasily Mahanenko. Second book just came out a few days ago.   Edit: he also wrote the way shaman series.
 Now that he has retired, Pope Benedict can finally devote time to his true passion: **standing on the corner in Winslow, Arizona**.  According to a new UN treaty, **standing on the corner in Winslow, Arizona** now qualifies as a weapon of mass destruction.  **standing on the corner in Winslow, Arizona**: Good to the last drop.  I do wish the newspapers hadn&amp;apos;t mentioned **standing on the corner in Winslow, Arizona** in grandpa&amp;apos;s obituary.  I got pulled over the other day because **standing on the corner in Winslow, Arizona** Apparently, that&amp;apos;s a crime.  I drink to forget **standing on the corner in Winslow, Arizona**.  Life for American Indians was forever changed when the White Man introduced them to **standing on the corner in Winslow, Arizona**.  TSA guidelines now prohibit **standing on the corner in Winslow, Arizona** on airplanes  To prepare for his upcoming role, Daniel Day-Lewis immersed himself in the world of **standing on the corner in Winslow, Arizona**.  WHOOO! God damn I love **standing on the corner in Winslow, Arizona**!
I made a similar trade, so I'm all for this. In dynasty, I think we overplay the "how long will X player for" when we have zero clue how long someone will play for. If you get two years out of Brees/MT, it's completely worth it.
D
But you've got a bigger gun...
My special guy has a bunch of big tattoos. They look awesome on him. They just fit. He's Kiwi, though, so it's partly a cultural thing and also it just goes with his his wild, idgaf personality.   His tattoos would look like crap on a different guy. They just wouldn't be right. He's big, muscular and fit, and has a certain way of carrying himself.   Put another way, I don't like or dislike tattoos, but I can love them because they express the personality of a person I love. 
Oh hey arm! :D
Dark:  FL = Colleen, Fire Panda,   BL =  Fei, Lushen (L), Raki, Theomars  Light you lack 1 good damage dealer, otherwise it's the same team as above but replace Raki with the solid single target nuker. A wind Samurai-style monster works well
Wow 3 defenders? How is that possible
Heels required 
I'm just hyping myself for when Stixxay locks in Tristana
What a bunch of party crashing losers. What's with all the cynicism and negativity that people constantly push around these days? Life's depressing enough as it is. 
I don't even mind Steve and Jeff. But I can't stand Rick at all.
Agreed, this would be the best.
Wrong. Game 1: 12 points, 6 assists, 40% shooting, -7 +/- and Isaiah Thomas torched him.  He upped his game from terrible to mediocre, and people here tried to throw a parade for him. Truly baffling. The bench (specifically Bobby Portis) ended up being the difference.  Rondo's Game 2 was great, though. Best game he's played in three years, so expect another game like that in 2020, unless he starts playing overseas before then. 
It's worth noting that the reflect damage on PBE Thornmail is 25 + 10% bonus armor, a considerable step down from 15% of incoming damage + 25% bonus armor.
It's true, Allo's "incognito mode" is E2EE, but so is the "[secret conversation](https://www.facebook.com/help/messenger-app/1084673321594605/)" mode in Facebook Messenger. They are both optional, so I assume the authors would have put Allo on the same level as Facebook Messenger. Probably to the left, though, because Allo is based on phone numbers...
Lol you just deflected and misrepresented everything she said...
I agree. It's like asking a question in German. If he doesn't understand what he's being asked, it doesn't make sense. He's suppose to magically understand German because some Canadians speak German? No, it's not an official language 
[Yes,](http://www.pagunblog.com/2017/06/12/burning-heretics-pat-mac-edition/) not that you included a link so I can't be sure. 
Remember when Howard Dean just yelled kind of weird and it tanked his campaign?
If I married him I wonder how his eligibility would work for ussf. Is gay marriage recognized by the ussf?
Haha good point! I should have got more lunatics!!! :D
David and it's not even close 
They keep trading who headlines on this tour. Hope for it to be Rise.
Buy a box of '15/'16 Upper Deck Series 1. Lots of packs to open and if you are lucky... the McDavid YG (Young Guns) sells for the price of ~2 more boxes right now.
I was surprised too. He's got to have amazing genes to be as active as he is at this age.   Edit: I am a little shocked at the reaction to such a simple comment. My wife has a hereditary immune disorder and will be very lucky if she's able to reach 60. She's already oxygen and a daily medicine regimen that would make even the worst pill-head shocked. My niece has CF and the outlook is not favorable for her either. Genes play an important role in how active and healthy you can be.
Anybody know how to get full blood work from the VA or is that not a thing? Got blood done a few months ago but didn’t look like a complete list. Like I’ve seen here. Thanks. 
weird, it should be there.  i don't remember if it's tied to level or something but idk  try a support ticket maybe?
could you explain why because i have no idea why im getting downvoted
Get a windshield washer pump from a junkyard. Mine pumps about a gallon a minute, and is pretty quiet.
In addition to the other comments, picking wild animals up and feeding them to your pet is a great way to transfer parasites and diseases.
if u rub white cream all over u u mite be a homo, just sayin
I hate it when Phreak casts, he seems to like bashing players and teams. Always talks about Jensen failing, and it gets annoying. I dont mind the others tho.
The bullets.
Who's on Dramas team? He tweeted "Champs is looking slow"
That dragon steal though. 
they all know anyway. it wont make a difference to indiana. they are losing him, and want what they want. 
Michael Jordan's driveway.  
I have also felt this. I guess it depends on the day. 
I didn't say anything about it not having a palpable impact - it's the leading traffic driver to our website and my work in the field on certain platforms is often cited in case studies and best practices - just that the people they continue to hiring in C-level positions (I'm now a director with a team of reports who manage various digital channels) never seem to fully grasp its true value and can only view things through the lens of sales and revenue. Sure, a lot of that comes back to pressure from the board, but I swear to god they have amnesia some days.
If its all a joke to keep it under wraps, I hope as hell Hardy's casting was for real and he was casted for the sequel. I mean the sequel starts filming next April/May, but the early casting announcement could be to make the Venom movie look real.  Its all a stretch but I really hope what you said its true.
**Converted Taobao Links:**  https://item.taobao.com/item.htm?id=552790664583  **********  [^(I am a bot)](https://www.reddit.com/r/FashionReps/comments/5r3p1i/psa_im_a_taobao_link_converter_bot_please_read/)^(. Please use https://taobaotools.github.io to convert your links.)
I second this. I'm 19, and about a year ago I was driving home from work at noon with my little brother in the passenger seat. I was two weeks, to the day, fresh on my license.   We were on a detour through a small town, and we were going the speed limit, following about a length and a half behind. My brother starts to say something, and I glance over, like you do, and somehow in that half a second the woman in front of me manages to slam on her brakes (with no turn signal) to turn into her driveway. I look up and slam on the brakes, but it was too late, and the next thing I knew my head hit the airbag. (For those of you who haven't been airbagged, it's like getting punched by a bag of air that feels like a bag of concrete going 35 MPH.)   I totaled my car, and even though she's the one who caused the accident, I got the ticket because I hit her. I couldn't drive for weeks afterward, and when I did it was so so so scary. But in a way, I'm glad it happened the way it did, because we only lost the car. If we hadn't been wearing seatbelts, we would have lost our lives.   Wear your seatbelts, kids. 
Thanks :)
i agree but the death and pain will be quick, solitary confinement for 23 hours in a small cell ( add few rats) for the rest of his life is still better deal. 
Is there anywhere online to watch these older shows? Miss them, they were hilarious.
It’s almost like you could have put the whole message in the title...
452
Jesus fuck how do you people manage to rope Trump into every aspect of your life like that
That's because you don't understand biology. Eggs are in a state of stasis, and while specific problems like lack of chromosome separation can occur on older eggs, the genetic information isn't being written over and over again. When cells divide many many times, like they do to make sperm, each division carries a risk of mutation. The machinery that ensures copy fidelity also become less efficient as men age. So, your gamete producing cells have been dividing since sperm production began, the more divisions the more mutations. Old sperm is worse than old eggs.  Here's a review article about autism rates in children with older fathers https://www.ncbi.nlm.nih.gov/pubmed/21116277 
How will Gon go to the DC when the boat already left? It's not like he has many other ways of transportation. And I don't think Togashi will have an arc of Gon regaining his nen, since that's basically what Heavens Arena was.
She called me an idiot first. I hate the downvotes but I'm not afraid to speak my mind.
That was absolutely beautiful
How's your EAGA or CAGA? They are top reds.
To be fair, many are extensions of the main five.
I'm in Left Canada and Digi-Key still manages to get stuff to me overnight. 
Bio Spira
Please change the title to, 'u/Morgangonzo and a fan.'
Been a big fan ever since he entered the league. Met him in MIN. Sweetest dude ever.  One of my favorite non-Jazz players today, and now he's on the Jazz. Love it.
Not quite. I accidentally put gas in my diesel truck and within a mile it started sputtering and would hardly run. I had to drain the tank because it will ruin some engine components 
Looks like Maisie Williams ate the dragon.
I knew some fucking idiots there. I still work with plenty of said idiots. I am likely one of the idiots.  I went to civilian schools before attending USAFA and I honestly don't think it's more academically demanding than the other schools I went to. It's tougher because you have competing priorities and can't devote as much time to academics, but actual core course content was no tougher than what I had elsewhere. 
I have no genetic physical illness thus it does not apply to me. Also considering I don't plan on imposing it on currently living people. Perhaps you need to be weeded out 
Perhaps Broughy or someone from NoDo has a video to show it, but it is a fact. The topmost spoiler option doesn't add traction (regardless of how it looks), all other options do (same — so a "no spoiler" option down the list actually adds traction).  If you like your car with the default spoiler option, just go with it. Unless your main goal is to win races, chances are it won't make much of a difference.
All roads need bike lanes.   It's the only reasonable choice, that and more density.  
---  &gt; &gt; **http://imgur.com/a/myIAb** &gt;  ---   *I am a bot whose sole purpose is to improve the timeliness and accuracy of responses in this subreddit.*   ---   **It appears you forgot to include your location in the title or body of your post.**   **Please update the body of your original post to include this information.**   ***Do NOT delete this post - Instead, simply edit the post with the requested information.*.**   ---   [Report Inaccuracies Here](https://www.reddit.com/r/LocationBot/) | [GitHub] (https://github.com/ianpugh/LocationBot2.0) | [Author](https://reddit.com/u/ianp) | [LocationBot Statistics (Not Mobile Friendly)](https://locationbot.info) | LocationBot v2.1.1   ---   Original Post:   Author: /u/atlasputty   **Preparing for Citation to Discover Assets (Creditor)** &gt;My parents received a small claims judgement against a wedding caterer who failed to refund a deposit for cancelled services. The caterer has not paid the judgement yet (it's been about 2 years). &gt;  &gt; Now my parents are trying to collect the judgement, starting with a citation to discover assets. He has been served by the sheriff and we have a court date set for the citation. &gt;  &gt; I don't have a legal background but I've been able to help my parents fill out all the paperwork pro se up to this point. &gt;  &gt; How should we prepare for the citation? What materials should we bring? Does the judge asks questions to debtor about his assets or do we need to prepare a set of questions to ask him about where his money is?
So is it Taiwan, Chinese Taipei, Republic of China, or what? Do we know how Lin would prefer it?
Time to swing for the fences
Fast &amp; furious part 5+, San Andreas, baywatch.  Future president, Dwayne the rock johnson, showing leadership in the face of adversity. Will become the new stepping stone to becoming president.
Finish carpenter will do a decent job at a reasonable cost. Cabinet maker will do really nice job but the cost will be high.
&gt; the most infamous being Old Sarum  Oh so that's what Bloodborne is about.
I think it was her half-assed way of sort of apologizing but not really apologizing. 
+1 on the basketball IQ and really that is the strongest argument. You would be getting a much smarter player than the Blob. Which is what kept Hulk off the squad, he would just eat the ball or kill someone and get a flagrant 2.   I just went with Blob because I felt he would out rebound Beast, and would be able to shut down half the paint to what I awesome would be another speedster as the opposing PG.  You could also consider someone like Antman or Doctor Manhattan as they would be able out reach the blob on rebounds, but no one besides Juggernaut could move the blob in the paint.   But Beast could work.
100%.  Since when has video footage of it happening every day started to count as proof? 
Please no fax machines
Well police have killed 597 people this year, and people have killed 31 police officers.   Where do we think the problem with guns is?   Sources  https://www.odmp.org/search/year  http://killedbypolice.net/
&gt;  you cannot argue that it's not holding Firefox back  Let's try ;)  Mozilla *chooses* to let add-ons hold them back. Lots of large add-on developers have to deal with breakage all the time, and do so just fine. Add-ons like Tab Groups, Tab Mix Plus, Classic Theme Restorer and others succeed in staying up-to-date with Nightly even. My guess is that for most add-ons that are not huge (so I'm not talking about something like Pentadactyl), developers are able to keep up with at least the beta release, even *without* Mozilla trying not to break them. If at some point a developer decides that he doesn't want to deal with it anymore, he can port his add-on to WebExtensions. If this is not possible, the add-on would be lost anyway. The status quo of this is losing fewer add-ons than what will happen now in Fx 57, and giving other developers who aim to port to WEs, but might not make it, more time to do so.  Sure, this might be a little annoying for people who are using unmaintained add-ons already, if they're only working because Mozilla puts effort in not breaking compatibility. But losing some of your legacy add-ons still seems better to me than losing all of them.
second floor at tootsies gettin shoulder rubs
I want to see Bigfoot in his natural territory same with the Loch Ness monster
Could you explain a little more for me , I'm in at .00350 (not much money ) still learning .   Should i just cut my 5 percent loss now , or hold ? I'm trying to learn how to day trade.  I've noticed a 35BTC ASK wall be put up which seems to prevent the momentum from going up .. every time it hits that wall you see people buying even above the wall and the price acts VERY strangely (people buying higher then the ask price )   Thanks !
AxiomOfInfinity
Ya I don't think he would ever purposely go after the gay community, but if Pence, Sessions, Bannon, or some close person with clout gave him a chance at something he wanted and LGBTQ people got fucked in the side wash of it he would agree in a heartbeat. *Not my voters, why should I care.*
Currently there are the 2 queens of the top lane. Fiora and Riven. After fiora has fallen, there will be only Riven so all the pitchforks will be pointed at her
I love seeing a successful hunt. 
The games launch is doomed. They've created reverse hype. Even if they somehow revamp the game from now till launch, the damage has already been done
I've traded with US folks before if that helps :) send me a PM if you're up for it.
$paid /u/tryshapepper 410
The last arc was great 
*gets destroyed by a warlord with overall rep 42 while playing my rep 5 conq*  &gt; On par with your skill  "Have you tried the advanced tutorial?"  Never uninstalled a game out of rage this fast.
Good ole Euopoor lites thinking Kraft Cheese is literally only Cheese Americans eat   Why don't you compare how much Cheddar America makes to UK?   You don't even read Wine &amp; Food do you?   When's the last time you had a Fraga? 
the way he was going it won't be long :-(
Sky blue low riders for one nitro
I too like invading foreign countries with no plan.
big if true
Thinking they're the smartest
This gave me dededepression
'89 actually; since the manga the movie is based on started then.
Oh yeah there is a fairy ring near nature alter isn't there and I've never done cosmics so wasn't thinking of it, just hadn't used these methods so wasn't coming to mind.  Thanks for clarifying.
Hahaha he'd be rattled 
Rizzo shifted into another gear during that run.
Likes or dislikes are a somewhat arbitrary release of pleasure when you achieve certain outcomes that align with your goals and value structures.   You like food because it aligns with the goal of surviving.   You like TV because it entertains the mind, which you have because it helps you pass on your DNA if you happen to enjoy life.   As for specifically what food and TV you like, it gets more specific and subjective. And yes, philosophers like Mill or Hume I think have discussed for example, what is the greater pleasure: a man or a pig.   For practicality, I think recognizing what you like and dislike in a more objective manner suffices enough. Instead of letting it control and pull you around, you use it as you please. 
why you talking to yourself cummy? 🤔
Male tiger, obviously.  He pissed off the female, got her all worked up, then showed his dominance by completely dropping his guard, just feet in-front of her, and casually drinking some water, proving that she was all roar and no bite.
There are many things.  Here are a few:  * allow medicare and Medicaid to negotiate the prices of medicines and medical equipment. * forbid collusion between insurance companies on pricing.  If I understand correctly, there's an exemption in the anti-trust laws for insurance.  * go to a single non-profit *payer* (not single *provider*) model.  Medical providers spend an inordinate amount of time dealing with insurance companies.   There are many others.
I know. I was being a smart ass. Happens a lot. 😛
The sum of human knowledge is probably mostly preserved in libraries and universities anyway. On the other hand, "Bridget The Midget's Interracial Threesome xXx" might very well be lost forever without proper backup on my hard drive.
To each his own. Trik is the main man in my book
Exactly. People don't have any clue how good he is on defense. 
It's Ukrainian brandy, "Xepcoh" is cyrillic for [Kherson] (https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Kherson), the name of a Ukrainian City.   Other than that, I know nothing useful.
Yes we aren't. 
It's easy to miss tbf
Yeah, I feel like they use split rims and that one went flying like a missile too
 I can be the Velma. 
Found 12 year old little billy's reddit account.
I love dipping my fries in A1 over anything else. 
I have the darkest legal tint available but I can still feel my face burning hot :-(. The shade doesn't completely block your view to my knowledge- but good to think about, hopefully someone else has experience 
Australia, it doesn't even show on the steam store for me
Birth 
Reading this list is making me angry. Lol
Ummm...do you want riots?  Because that's how you get riots.
I wish it was about picking the strongest, I just pulled all of them so they're all lvl 1 and 3* lol
When it said DM Day and was an Instagram link, that was my risky click of the day
Automatic wipers and lights are pretty standard nowadays.. My 2012 Ford Fiesta had them, my 2016 Volkswagen Golf has them and the 2016 BMW 1 series I drive for work has them. I never specifically asked for both features but they were included everytime. 
You're explaining why it is grammatically incorrect. Others are explaining how the mistake was made.  Two different conversations, or at least that's what I got from it.   Just my $0.02...carry on. 
True dedication to the art to practice in 110 degree temp.  Respect!
Omg all old battle master? Maybe missing an eye? But still so sweet and kind and makes a mean dinner on the bonfire 
Capers. Fucking love me some capers.
Can I get some team help? This is what auto set did for me. And to the left is all my other chars   https://imgur.com/gallery/bjHLn
Justin hamilton? 
How to solve the housing crisis? Kick Amazon out of Seattle! No jobs = no demand! Brilliant!
Not saying I agree or disagree with you but this post is already halfway up the front page
Which is precisely why I keep my network status at bottom left... https://gfycat.com/NeatDimpledElkhound
I wouldn't afk level gathering.  The exp is really bad. Filter some of your water, get some pickaxes and head out to pilgrim's haven and grab some rough stone.  Don't sell the rough stone as you'll need it for numerous things in the game (making cooking/alchemy stations/repairing fort in node war) but it gives you the best gathering XP and it only gets better as your level goes up.  With processing you can powerlevel with flax.  Not really worth too much processed so it's better if you invest in the nodes and have your workers gather what you process.  It gives unusually high XP.  When you hit Prof 10 is when I'd start processing other things like wood/ore etc
Tasty looking modern gym climb!
I once forgot my toothbrush kit on a multi day hike...  Luckily a buddy of mine had some toothpaste he could share, and I used a twig. Pretty frustrating but it worked
Thank you! :)
And a second rounder that became Davis Bertans. 
Can you send me more details on what the issue is? Then I can help you debug.
I also LOVE the acoustic versions he does of some of the songs on there. Just makes me realize how amazing his songwriting is that he can break down the songs to just acoustic and vocals and still retain so much of the song.  And Queen of California has recently become an absolute favorite song (especially the Crossroads performance), I listen to it 2-3 times a day!  Totally agreed on Walt Grave live. Saw it in KC and it was a beautiful experience. It's also one of those songs that I discuss the meaning with friends all the time. Love Chris Botti's part in the studio intro too
I always figured Thassarian was primarily frost focused because of the duel wield talent back in the day.
Man, too true. We hired on a new cleaning company to clean our house last week. The guy comes over before the first cleaning to do a walk through. I'm a decent judge of character, and right away I could tell this guy was good-to-go, and I hired him on the spot.   Fast forward to last Monday.. he shows up just before 7:00am, and is trying to find a place to park in the neighborhood (we live in a small square block - think houses around the square's perimeter and houses on the inside, with a single street), so he had to circle through the neighborhood a couple of times. He finally decided to park a house down from us at the curb. As he is unloading his truck a cop shows up. Said a neighbor called them about a suspicious person "casing" the neighborhood.   I was so embarrassed I told the guy to come back another day, and paid him extra.  It's not even like it's an all white hood. It's upper middle class, and several ethnic families live here.   I was honestly very surprised and disappointed with my neighbors.
So is the midtown discord any different from the discord linked below? I joined the one Insendi posted 
QuantumTristan
Cat.
This submission has been automatically removed because you did not include a question mark ("?") in your title. Reddit does not allow post titles to be edited, so if you would like, you can post the question again.  Please write your title in proper question format, and include a question mark, thank you.  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/AskReddit) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Maybe you should stop being gay then. Why should the rest of America have to put up with your homosexuality? If you want to go against the word of God and our president, Donald J Trump, you should pay the consequences.
Its not super obvious what Cathedral City is.
Sheldon Cooper would play Barrier Statue or chain burn. No regard for what people think of him, he just wants to win in the most efficient way possible.
A lot of theaters are installing recliner chairs withing stadium style seating configurations.  If you happen to have any theater around that has upgraded to this I don't think your height will be an issue no matter where you choose to sit.
Sure, added!!
I assume he has ids. I can feel the hate through your comments lol
But honestly Cole's command this game is bad. Just wishing he goes 6 innings.
A twelve-year-old liberal! Nice. I've hit the jackpot.
Pickup trucks pretty much HAVE to be rear wheel drive. There's very little weight in the back of an empty pickup, even with rear-wheel drive. So if you removed the (heavy) drive shaft and rear differential required for rear wheel drive, you'd be left with pretty much no weight whatsoever back there. So when the pickup bed is empty, there would be no weight to keep the rear wheels pushed down to the ground. All the weight would be in the front of the truck from the engine. So when you drove, the slightest bump would cause the rear of the truck to bounce all over the road and you'd have very little control over the vehicle.   The other problem is that when you load up the truck bed with heavy stuff (think construction materials) you weigh down the rear axle and "lift weight" off the front axle. So, if you had a heavy load in a front-wheel-drive pickup truck, you could find yourself in a situation where you'd have a tough time getting traction from the front wheels.
I hate myself 
I am not sure that terf should be claimed to be an insult,  or maybe as an insult alone.  It was coined in a [neutral way differentiate between different radical feminist](http://transadvocate.com/terf-what-it-means-and-where-it-came-from_n_13066.htm)  Problem is I am not sure you can make that differentiation and not get some snarl word usage.
*Alexander rushes over*  "Are you ok?!"
Check OpenSports and the meetup app (Toronto Soccer Meetup, specifically).  I've managed to play 3-4 nights a week this summer using a combination of the two to find pickup games.
I was a kid in the 1970s and Happy Days was for a couple of years the number 1 highest rated show on TV here in Australia, but our parents never watched that channel so I didn't know what Happy Days was and couldn't figure out why kids went around with their thumbs up going 'Heeeey!'  Later on I did get to see it as it was repeated endlessly. It wasn't that funny but some of the characters like Fonzie, Ritchie, Joanie, Chachi were considered cute or cool so the show had its fans. There was an episode where Fonzie did water-ski over a shark. It was a silliest scene in a show where there were many silly scenes, but being one scene didn't affect the series long term (after that story was over the show continued just as it had before.)  What really did weaken the show was the cast departures. The loss of Ritchie was the worst, and the season without Chachi and Joanie was particularly thin.
More CUs does not always = more power because you can balance how much power each CU gets. You can make a 16 CU GPU use more power than a 24 CU GPU. 
Living paycheck to paycheck, without any actual security (i.e. living on reduced spending but knowing that you do actually have money for when shit goes wrong)  Not for a long time, but just long enough to make them learn to empathize with people who don't have much. We label people so easily as lazy or criminals or whatever, when we don't realize that everyone is trying to make their way in the world.
If you accept modern interpretations of the constitution then you really have no argument leveraging the second amendment to defend the right bear any arms you want. 
*Madeline nods.* "About a month ago there was a small girl, only about 7 years old that was here for a while. That was me."
I'm impressed with reds fans showing to this game. Thier team is in last and they have more fans than first place nationals aganist us
NA, pc expansions pls
Esther   Agnes   Gertrude   Cecelia   Walter   Mavis   Cuthbert 
how you know I'm seriously peeing myself I'm so pumped
It's crazy when you consider that the battle happened many, many years ago...
I do get stuck in the ICE Checking. I used the web version.
Actually it isn't. Maybe it's included in Ultimate Skyrim itself or Realistic animals and predators, but I just tried and it worked.  Sorry for a pointless post.
congratulations on complaining about your fancy new car asshole, some of use have to cling to late models  then again.. MY shit is paid for
Youre better off taking levels in Paladin. More stat synergy, heavy armor and a d10 hit die.  Also add smites using Sorc spell slots and you get some great combos.
Wallpaper?
Hittade Stefan Holms redditkonto.
It can be depending on your play style and mostly your chosen difficulty setting. But generally it is stealth oriented. Survival style. 
These tank mechanics are great because they give a reason for people to bring WAR into trials.   We do no damage and can barely tank, but at least we can smash our face into the keyboard repeatedly. 
I'm going by what her father said on the stand.   Also forgot to add that they found two semen stains in Channon's underwear that didn't match Chris or the 4 perps.
Tattoos and body piercings.
WW3 can break new ground and have rural America fighting on one side with Russia while the large cities fight on the Allies' side.
https://twitter.com/JasonAtTheGame/status/880852453763239936 Severino draws walk https://twitter.com/JasonAtTheGame/status/880829180065308673 Severino's oppo triple...smoked this one  ENJOY
I don't see how Trump is tough at all.
The post still says "UPDATE on the project"
I don't disagree with committing to them, but I do think it's very easy to fall into sunken cost fallacies when using shields. Even if you have 15 shields skill, finding a great 2h can be sufficient incentive to ditch your shield.
&gt; ONE war and hundreds of years of martial history get ignored  Two; can't forget Franco-Prussian!
Prediction. It will rain hard enough not to go back green, but not hard enough to red flag the race and almost the entire rest of the stage runs under caution. 
You look like a younger douchier Martin shkreli.  It also looks like you just got done crying and you are trying to prove to yourself you can take anything now
Nty
On the brink of futurology
Wood
Are you using internet explorer?
Uh u got a source..?? Or is it ym...
Go on...
DRINK
Yes, I'll see you out on the lake!  H
Do you own all 5 counties directly or are they all owned by vassals? Are the duchies owned by you or by vassals? 
people did this for like a week when the previous honor system launched.
This reminds me that I keep getting the same Ike and Hector from my friend list and they solo the guantlet
There is. Contempt of court isn't a crime so there is nothing to be pardoned. My understand is the judge just sends you to jail until you are willing to talk. In that case, no pardon could save him because he hasn't committed a crime or been sentenced to anything.
a big body doesn't make it a truck
A cider don't make me smell terrible
When I was 17 all I wanted was a trabant. I live in NY. 
[$32 USD for a 100](https://www.cableorganizer.com/ez-rj45-network-plugs/) consumer rates  about $10.00/100 if you buy in bulk(3000+) from local electrical supply house.   *wrong links :O
I have a pocket sheath on the way to just keep it in a pocket 
im just trying to figure out where I can cop that sweater
I was actually at e3 and near the arms tournament they were selling merch. I asked about the sweet ass jacket Mr. Yabuki was wearing she told me that don’t let this man distract you from the fact that in 1998, The Undertaker threw Mankind off Hell In A Cell, and plummeted 16 ft through an announcer’s table.
Nuts, but only *in* other foods. Plain nuts are fine. 
Don't worry guys, me and my flat ass temps are drunk poolside. The BDing has been completed (for the last 6 days straight). See ya tomorrow, new flat temp! 
I really hate this argument. Texas did not steal Oklahoma from us. Oklahoma decided their rivalry with Texas was (and objectively correct) more important.   While Nebraska's main rival was Oklahoma, we were always second fiddle to Texas in Oklahoma eyes. 
Good eye. I'll check it out on my way back through
Any rain updates
SECTION | CONTENT :--|:-- Title | Joe Garry Does Real Tricks 2 Description | "I just don't get big wheels...  Here are some real tricks I did today to show people what real skating is" - Joe Garry  www.mushroomblading.com Length | 0:01:47     ****   ^(I am a bot, this is an auto-generated reply | )^[Info](https://www.reddit.com/u/video_descriptionbot) ^| ^[Feedback](https://www.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=video_descriptionbot&amp;subject=Feedback) ^| ^(Reply STOP to opt out permanently)
[nya](https://www.pixiv.net/member_illust.php?mode=medium&amp;illust_id=53608284)
Just a little thing I wanted to add to my flair. Mostly based on [this](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=cTLvLE9pWck) and because I love the word "Dark" ;)
sasageyo!
Thanks, you're a nice person to not shame me over saying the wrong name. I didn't know that Pope Benedict was in the Hitler youth. I can remember reading lots of things about the 2nd world war though, and how normal Germans were scared of the Nazi regime and that one shopkeeper wife was asked 'how is business?' and she scoffed and said 'What business? We have no business!' and the Nazi's took her away the next night for having spoken out against them. She never came back. I guess what I'm saying is that I'd be inclined to go easier on people that made bad decisons back then. Especially if they were young, I'm still pretty shocked though. I can't imagine a person who was once a member of the Hitler Youth ever becoming Pope. I'm a bit surprised and confused to hear that.
That's one minority.
Anthony Bennet 2.0
Yea they advise me to either accept the return and accept the lost. Or not do anything and escalate it higher. 
Really appreciate it! I've got more coming soon
Ketchup has no earthy business hear a steak 
On paper they don't have to, but if the managers are sensible human beings then there's no way they'd refuse to try to figure out workarounds to compensate you given the situation you and they are in. 
If I remember correctly, Hershey's makes it in the US. Nestlé manufactures it for the rest of the world. 
I have never bothered entering a zip code. It automatically pulls up my zip code as LA, I apply anyway and it's worked 12 times so far.
Neoteny is the manipulation of animal instincts so that breeders can continue passing on their genes. That's it. Every time a guy likes a girl for being cute or a woman likes a guy for being cute. Every time a woman goes "awww" when she sees a baby monkey or a kitten, it's just her animal instincts kicking in. These people are not seeing anything, objectively. They are just reacting to their breeder programming. Because without that programming, most babies and children wouldn't survive to adulthood. There is even a study that proves that the few babies who are unlucky enough to be born extremely ugly instead of cute, end up being abandoned or treated like shit by their parents(often not surviving to adulthood) yet these same parents would have treated a cute baby like gold.  
I was looking at the spelling lol   Edit: I can't read
Jesse Ventura's Brain Invaders  and  Fluxliner
&gt;[**Bodyform Responds :: The Truth [1:45]**](http://youtu.be/Bpy75q2DDow)  &gt; [*^BodyformChannel*](https://www.youtube.com/channel/UCDcDWDqUsrj23EeO-2sjRnA) ^in ^Entertainment  &gt;*^5,903,482 ^views ^since ^Oct ^2012*  [^bot ^info](/r/youtubefactsbot/wiki/index)
Please use the [Weekly Summons/RNG Megathread](https://redd.it/6jes4e)! Thank you!
Not very photogenic so this going to be an issue I see
Looking at your questions, it's unclear whether your site will be focused on finding players for face-to-face games, for real-time online play including VTTs, for play-by-post, or all of them. Since AFAIK players tend to treat face-to-face and online quite differently, maybe that confusion is contributing to your poor reception.
provide evidence.
maybe its the fact that there "is" a sale?
When you're the same temperature as the air around you, that means the air around you isn't wicking away your excess heat, so your temperature rises putting you at risk of heat stroke. All you can do is sweat the excess heat off but that's much less efficient. 
Such an awesome smile!!! Glad he's all better. 
I've always wanted to be able to jump in that game.  Just because I like to jump everwhere, way more fun than just running.
Holy shit... thank fuck it worked out.
Does War Thunder have a display for the frame rate?
I went to Raubahn's on EA day, got hit with the wall and spent the next two days leveling my RDM. By the time I hit 60 in it the issues were almost fixed. I had more issues with the 90ks on Sunday though. All in all I love this expac. 
Other than it's a neighboring nation that's been under Garlean rule since they were conquered some years ago? Nothing.
Close! R.B.'s is correct. But it stands for Raffel Brothers for the two founders: Forrest and Leroy Raffel.
I know you can buy FF6 with mobile visuals on PC, as I saw it in the current Steam sale. I don't know about playing one's existing Android copy on PC, though. 
Jeff for President
I'm not sure they legally could at the time. Can't speak about now but it's like how the WWE World title never shared lineage with the WCW and NWA World titles, despite looking like them.
Just look it up. Sorry i fucking hate it when people do that to me but I'm exhausted and too lazy to find it.  This isn't a discussion about women's happiness anyways it's about mens mental health something I'm extremely passionate about given my own issues with mental health. I was just giving my theories on the situation.   Men are not needed by society anymore because one of the primary things they provided (financial support) is either taken from them via the courts or women just make their own money and don't need men to provide for them.  
His motivator boost is very noticeable. Whole offense blocks better. But, they kinda robbed him as a rb. He's ok, not spectacular. They made him an elusive back that can't really truck (which is some infuriating bullshit) but he stiff arms like a madman and can squeeze through the tackles pretty well
Not if you play as melee build Krieg... bosses fall to your buzz axe in one ult.  Airborne bosses and the Warrior are kind of a bitch though (fortunately there's a glitch spot on the Warrior) 
Uh, Cooper Cobras aren't drag tires. They're "look at my hot rod" tires. About the only thing I ever see them used for competitively is dirt track because they're so cheap.
So? Lots of GSP and Silva's defences were against undeserving dross. I love dan hardy as a fighter, but fuck me he has no business in a title fight. Middleweight went from boring to the most competitive title division in 12 months since Bisping became champ. 
I agree deulofeu wasn't bad as others, but he's  just not a good captain. Too whiny and just doesn't have the cojones to be a captain.
Hashtag Harry is good.... When he uploads.
Yes it is. Just rush through the story asap. 
[is this article more of your liking snowflake?](https://www.theguardian.com/us-news/2017/jun/23/obama-cia-warning-russia-election-hack-report)  [or this one](http://www.foxnews.com/politics/2017/06/24/trump-questions-why-obama-allegedly-did-nothing-about-russia-hacking-in-fox-interview.html)   [maybe this one?](http://www.independent.co.uk/news/world/americas/us-politics/russian-hacking-barack-obama-received-intelligence-bombshell-investigation-washington-post-donald-a7805996.html)  there are a lot of quotes there choose the one you like the most 
The Catholic Church did oppose the translation of the Bible to a more common language. Once it was translated...   Guess how the Protestants formed.   Common literacy didn't seem to benefit the Catholics as much. 
Just watched the finale. When Elaine says "puddy, don't wait for me" he just says "alright"  Gets me every time.😂
What's hilarious is that in your title, the word "millennial" is literally followed by "something negative"
Really? Why would they even start the race in the first place? What the actual fuck NASCAR.
What the actual fuck.  Who is this guy?
It's already low with counter attack selected though.
I appreciate the effort that goes into the livestream but we don't always need an elaborate unveiling. Patch the game and we'll read the patch notes. Save the streams for bug announcements. 
This is already a feature
Except for the lochs, fuck the lochs.
Or willing to see dead bodies without drinking yourself to death to cope with it?
inb4   &gt;You have been removed of approval to submit to /r/POTUSWatch:  r/POTUSWatch: Keeping up with the current President and his administration.
&gt; Aren't black people allowed to get loans?, to benefit from the Gi bill?  The 1944 GI Bill was not for black servicemen, dumbass. 
ahh no, it doesnt work now on a different pc. It was one guy who only wanted female unpaid crew. It was quite creepy. 
I got this from the stupid bases loaded pack. Bases loaded have been horrible rip offs this year
380-390 ft-lb of torque vs the Toureg's 590... I think I know who my money is on. 
Kaz takes a seat, smiling. ["Yup I'm ready, lay it on me."](/bp)
Additionally, is there a different mag that would fit which is not discontinued? 
Do you believe the views of a co-founder reflect the views of the group and rest of the members all the time?
Absolutely! Best to just get out of the snake's away as fast as possible. Sticking around to 'defend' yourself is nonsense. Leave the poor snake to its business and it won't mess with you.  I've never heard of a rattlesnake chasing anyone down to kill, but dear lord that would be terrifying. I'd skip the gun and just pack a flamethrower if that were the case.
Do benchmarks even matter anymore? Even if OEMs dont cheat, today's flagships and even mid-rangers perform well enough the homegrown UI/launcher and its ressource usage makes a bigger impact than a couple extra MHz.
The first series was good with the whole ancient Egypt thing. GX was fine but started to get a little repetitive but it was still entertaining. 5Ds was great IMO. And then it got insane. The current meta in the TCG and the card game is total BS. You've got fuck all life points and the entire game is "who can summon the most stupidly powerful monsters in the least turns?" in place of strategy. Just my $.02
I hope they come by nycc 
Thank you!!
Skullgirls. If you don't mind looking like a loser because of all the tiddy, it has a pretty great tutorial and stuff
Towns and Butler are 100% ahead of him as far as offensive options go, WIggins might be to.
I guess I'm just a Rick fangirl. If Rick says he was betrayed and Jerry is enemy then I believe it!   Shinzo o sasageyo!
No sticky rice is served in clumps. Boiled, slightly soupy rice could be served in globs though.
Because they're bored wanna try sumfin new
There are posts every day now about people taking these home and 'rescuing them', probably killing them as a result.   Please stop taking baby birds away from where they are. Their parents take care of them when they are on the ground. This is common. This is how they do it. Some species fall out of their nests before being able to fly more often than not.   Leave baby birds where they are =,(
Cannot recommend Marvel Unlimited enough! Especially if you want the full experience for your 1-700 journey. And as /u/Mc_Spider_02 said the side issues are awesome and marvel unlimited is usually pretty good about having those in que after you read an issue. Some events are followed in different issues. Example would be when a big spidey event would happen you would have to read a issue from amazing, spectacular, and Web to follow the story line in order.
No way! That was awesome, even on the receiving end. 
did y'all bring in another male partner or female partner first?
I can see having your mind focused on detailing cars being almost like auto pilot.  You could let the rest of it go into a story.  That's cool!  I'm learning so much.  You guys are great.
I'm surprised no one's already asked. What?
Thanks for posting to /r/dirtykikpals, /u/iwanktoboobs! We encourage all of our users here to verify themselves, to possibly get more/better responses, as well as help us in dealing with sellers, scammers, etc. For information on how to verify, please check our sidebar or message us at [modmail](https://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2Fdirtykikpals).  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/dirtykikpals) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Ah, it's good to know that you can do that- I've been using separate wallets for each OS. I should probably consult these things with Priya more, haha.
* Sound quality is worse but coolness factor goes up. * Turntablism on 45s is even more impressive * Way lighter to transport crates of 45s - 2 toolboxes of 45s is like 4-5 crates of 12s
Do you not have a hand vac?
ill be the skinny kid at the front of the line with an injury reserve t shirt
Mount and Blade   Warframe   Starsector   OpenTTD   Dwarf Fortress
Don't forget CORNDAWG!!!
I am a dude, yes, but it's nothing so complicated as that, I just misread the post because I'm a dumbass haha
&gt; I'm agreeing with the guy saying that Drake can be called the Jay of this generation because they're both moguls. Yes, that's what I'm categorically disagreeing with. First, Drake isn't anywhere near the mogul Jay was/is. Secondly, Jay isn't Jay because of the number of records sold. He's Jay because of the bars, the charisma, the classic albums, the personality, the business, man. Jay and Drake generally don't even rap about the same shit. Jay a born hustler who came from the mud. Drake is a child TV star. Jay grew up in the Marcy projects while Drake came up in Canada. There's no criterion by which Drake is the new Jay Z. Didn't even include the fact Jay is just by far the better musician. Like, it's not even close.
You are walking or at least being wheeled around so it is moving all over the place. 
Yep. I guess I'm abusing that people don't have a player history of me, therefore they assume I'm the average player, and therefore that my range will be balanced there by 99-AA. But really I only do that with Aces and maybe Kings.
&gt; perhaps part of a ploy to make it look like an accident  Never attribute malice to something that can be explained by sheer stupidity.
Um Nick is sniping lol
Will someone please go get me something other than a baseball signed? I'll pay you back.
YEAH atta boy pence!. 
Bio 3 nitros 1 turbo and cobalt tunica for slip?
How should it sound?
Imagine a player with meepo, arc warden, pudge, rubick, bristle
Coffee it is ;)
Watch out! C9s biggest fan is gonna GETCHA!
That was not the one I expected, but I had considered it. Good, I say.
Getting more fps here.
Happy Canada Day to you too! ~~Canadian citizen trapped in Florida~~
Ughhhhhhh full circle. That was awful. 
Honestly wouldn't even bring it up. Way too awkward.
Sounds good to me, I stand behind my choice. Mainly because Monarchs Migrate here(yea they are transplants) and tiger swallowtails are born here ;)
10:25
If you agree to board the pun train, please sign above the dotted line.
I agree but let's not for a second act like the vote was legitimate.
&gt; Wir sind zu lieb  und - schande - wir (als eltern) sind es wohl "schuld". wenn man als kind zur "geprügelten generation" gehört, will man nicht, daß die eigenen kids das auch noch erleben - und übertreibt es ein bißchen mit der nettigkeit.  &gt; Erfolg wird groß geschrieben.  aus der nummer bin ich jetzt dummerweise in vielerlei hinsicht komplett raus. ich bin ja nun wirklich der besagte "[60 years old hippie](https://imgur.com/a/uzggu)", für uns galt karriere als der personifizierte satan, was die gesellschaft von uns dachte, war uns ziemlich egal, wir haben unser eigenes ding gemacht, peace &amp; love, a punky reggae party ... scheiss auf die gesellschaft. ich kann also nicht wirklich die mühle verstehen, in der du steckst. ich bin aber nicht so anmaßend zu sagen: "steig aus!" ([„Turn on, Tune in, Drop out!“](https://de.wikipedia.org/wiki/Timothy_Leary)), wie frei oder unfrei du dein leben führst, liegt in deiner verantwortung - von mir nur der hinweis, daß es alternativen gibt und man sich einer gesellschaft nicht anpassen muss.   das kann, wie in unserem falle, dazu führen, daß man der welt so etwas wie das internet und computer hinterläßt, weil man frei genug im kopf war. die angepassten benutzen den kram heute ohne ihn zu verstehen.  da gilt auch für meine kids: ich erwarte nicht von ihnen, daß sie einen weg gehen, den ich mir für sie vorstelle und lasse die das mal selbst entscheiden. du hast da wahrscheinlich andere erfahrungen gemacht und ich erzähle dir dies nur, damit du weißt: es geht auch ohne dieses überfordern der kinder, weil man sie als die fortsetzung der eigenen existenz unter dem motto "es soll den kindern mal besser" mißbraucht. ja will ich auch, aber was das ist, sollten sie besser slbst wissen - ich habe keinen plan oder rat.  &gt; geh studieren  meine drei töchter tun das. alles mögliche zwischen archäologie, philosophie, kunstgeschichte. sie verstehen das als die zeit, die sie sich nehmen, bevor das leben sie zermalmt. ich verstehe es als die zeit, in der man die hingabe an ein thema lernt und wie man in die tiefe geht.  wenn man es macht, weil man karriere machen will, muss man mit den resultaten, die dieser wunsch erzeugt, leben.  &gt; In der muslimische Kultur finde ich ist es vor allem die fehlende Wissenschaftlichkeit oder der glaube an Wissenschaft  also, der gebildetste, liebenswürdigste und sanfteste mensch in meinem leben war muslim. arbeitet heute als sterbebegleitender psychologe. muslim sein und gleichzeitig nach bildung und wissen zu streben, scheint sich nicht auszuschließen ;)  &gt; Aber gut , dass sind jetzt meine Beobachtungen.   ich weiss nicht, ob meine anmerkungen hilfreich waren, oder verwirrend. vielleicht am besten so zusammengefasst: gib einen verdammten scheiss drauf, was andere von dir erwarten, es ist **dein leben**. mach, wonach dir der sinn steht und was dich mit sinn und glück erfüllt. lass die anderen reden, die müssen dein leben nicht leben. hör auf deine eigene innere stimme und geh ein wagnis ein.  oder pass dich an und bedauere am ende deiner tage, daß du es nicht getan hast. ich gucke auf meines, es ist einiges schiefgegangen, aber ... ich hatte mindestens vier oder fünf leben und jedes einzelne macht mich zufrieden. es waren **meine** und ich habe nur mir selbst gehört.
this. libtards love to say that everything is running out and non-renewable.  clearly, sand is "renewable". All it is is crushed fucking rocks.
I have been having a try of crash 2 this morning and while it's a little better I feel there is a distinct problem in engine perhaps, consistent flaws such as hitboxes and slippery controls (also what the fuck is with the ice levels? Do I have rockets on my shoes? When I slide that's the only way to control on ice). Some things I personally find shouldn't have gotten through play tests.
Thats just a bug in the shooting range, not in actual games.
Loup is like "fuck this shit, not again."
**True story.....**
try as i might, i just can't get enough talk about kevin love
I do not support brexit but from " brexit means brexit" and "no deal is better than bad deal" I suspected hard brexit it is. "Strong and stable" convinced me that May has nothing, no plan no strategy and after GE that became even more obvious. Eu has plans without UK  and recent demands are just to make it harder for UK to change direction even if narrative in country might change. I hope I am wrong.  Edit: economy part? Elites care about power, not economy. Who cares about some poor peasant barely feeding family? As long there are no riots - fuck em.
"I don't like thing, please change game."
Am I the only one who doesn't know which is which.
I'm interested in the tiana and Merida thrones, baby Merida, the diamond hidden mickey on the last page and tinkerbell on page 10. [here](https://imgur.com/gallery/7T9IS) are my traders! Willing to trade multiple for one pin as well!
Mhm   Dead nan
When I heard RE5 was set to be in Africa, I was so sure Billy would be in it. Considering his background, it would've made sense.  I was also surprised he wasn't brought up in RE Vendetta since Rebecca was a main character.
True, but I like his double 7c
You can relate to shooting innocent people?
I recommend a chat service for your website (instead) as the virtual chat agents are likely to get more information from your customers. For a telephone service maybe just use a selection service so the customer can choose the department they want to go :)  Check out Tawk.to - their chat is free and you can use it on your mobile - but they also have a virtual chat agent for $1 per hour (USD) https://www.tawk.to/hire-chat-agents-1hr/  I use Tawk.to for all my clients websites who want a chat service, it's perfect &amp; free!
Yeah and never deflect blame.  People will respect you when you own up to your shit.
It's Hayward or Griffin.
1,879,108
 This video has been removed by a bot since it looks like the link is no longer valid.   Message the moderators if this link is still valid.
Thank you. I've felt jittery before, but not this early on.   I'll smaller lines of bumps for a bit. ❤️
Every time someone makes excuses for their favorite brand, a PR person gets their wings!
Sounds like a migraine to me. The aura I get before the pain starts is similar to looking through swiss cheese. I can't read a single thing without staring for a while.
he isn't a great fit with our shit shooters actually
This is amazing! Eevee is tops in my book!
I do take medication and feel ok, thanks! 
Sir, those are panties. I'm going to have to insist that you use the word.
TL;DR: Because your body can no longer lose heat.  Heat moves from hot to cold. Heat is when molecules "vibrate" faster than others - the hotter molecules bang into colder ones and transfer some of their energy, just like smashing a cue ball into other balls on a pool table. Energy gets transferred and taken away from the cueball, just like energy from the warm molecules in your body gets taken away when you radiate heat.  Your body regulates its temperature by using sweat or radiating heat into colder air... but can't do either when it's too humid for sweat to evaporate, or when the air is as hot as your body. There's no slower molecules in the air for your body to lose the energy in its faster molecules.  So you can't automatically regulate the temperature of your body and your body knows this by letting you know "its really hot and unhealthy here, do something different, ok?" so it can restore its ability to regulate its temperature.
Sending strength and good vibes your way! You got this!
I said you'd have to be blind to not credit Melo for getting Denver to the playoffs and you said no doubt. That isn't very clear. You're also speaking complete nonsense if you say taking a team from 17-65 to 43-39 in your ROOKIE season isn't a big deal 
Lantana camera. They're adorable 
Lol you can literally just FYI anything if your delusional enough. Trump will literally put y'all back into the closet if he can.
None, PayPal only.
I'm no expert, and maybe it's just a filter, but it might be one of those gizmos that supposed to magnetize the fuel and increase mpg.  You know, fantasy stuff. 
&gt;We socialists must at all times study one-another, and remember that despite this difficult history amongst ourselves (which I am pessimistic about avoiding in the future), we strive for the same end goal. We are by nature comrades, and this is only invalidated at the point of aggression against ourselves, and this invalidation is to be made pointless in the end.  It's like you have substituted class analysis with some bizarre ideologies-analysis.
I see your point and want to genuinely apologize. I was indeed way out of line. No need to be a jerk to strangers, especially when talking about Disney stuff. 
Wonder Balloons is barely a deck and Magic Reflector gets like 0 use outside of Toons, I think it would be fine.
No, it's "post content people don't want to see, get down voted". 
I agree with this, I'm more asking from a medical perspective. 
I'm really not a fan of colorful watches, but man is the blue and grey gorgeous or what?
What's the point of saying this? We all already know it's technically true.
IKR Republicans even had to stoop so low as to not offend freaking white supremacists this election. Trump had to be forced to denounce David Duke :/ 
Actually, in theory, it is possible to see the actual dinosaurs in real time. If you were to go millions of light years away in an instant and have a huge, huge, huge fantastic telescope and looked back at earth, you'd see the earth as it looked millions of years ago, dinosaurs included.
Gl man i hope u get to sell them
Or find your own duo queue partner? 
Gagner is pretty bad as a center tho. He would be a huge downgrade from Anisimov
lol dude is just acting elite, the truth is metas that are strip mine locking are not metas that are using bounce lands.  bounce lands have their own strength in that they are a great budget option and if played right, are better than most tapped lands.  There are a few exceptions of course, and yeah, if it gets blown up you're in some deep shit. But some one that would turn 2 strip mine a bounce land isn't some one I'd want playing in my meta.  If you're playing a competitive match, sure, but competitive matches and decks don't use bounce lands. So the scenario he presents is just too asinine to take seriously.
yeah but years of failure and everyone hating you before that so it's probably not worth it
👏👏👏👏
So if a group of people moves in to your neighborhood and set new rules, like let's say that you have to give half your income to them or else they will lock you up, this is totally normal to you because it's "their laws"? If not, explain in detail why. 
Yeah its definitely not the best roster that never was but was still a cool team to think that never happened. Also cos i really liked the FaZe Black teams
Pardon me. Three soul-deadening, tedious, ridiculous times.
What does it matter on what they look like?  Most of the time the guy is wearing a mask or you don't see his face.   That is,  if they know what they're doing. If you see me throughout the years,  no one seriously suspect that,  at one time,  I had a 10 foot  wooden St Andrews cross in my living room that was disguised as a chandelier.   edit: corrected my drunk engrish.
i drove through this traffic today and i thought i was going to die sitting for 3 hours in nothing but stagnant traffic so i just sat on my roof and enjoyed the breeze 
Holy shit man, your like a savant regarding this stuff...
Played a very similar list to yours on Stream late last year, we dubbed it "Flick My Junk" because immature deck names are my jam.  Main different was a couple of the one-ofs were cut in favour of Blade Splicer, as Coco into Wisp+Splicer = 10 power, which is nuts after a wrath. Have you tried him in your build at all?
Dulwich Hamlet is fun on the dafuge challenge I'm doing for my current save because they get very good attendance for that level and are based in London so have lots of room for growth. They also have a very solid team for the Conference South right off the bat and a decent rep for getting a senior affiliate. Makes consecutive promotions pretty easy and viable.   In 16 I had a very long Chelmsford LLM save because they had a fun striker at the lower level who got some absurd number of goals and a cool shade of red for their uniforms.   I also loved a Paris FC save I did a long time ago. Surpassing PSG wasn't easy :/
I would throw it in a Orlandeau Chain, and I use Toxic Rain to boost the chain to 10 super quick.  So i think maybe 1-2 hits wouldnt be at max multiplier, bit still boosted
I've said it to not have to repeat my very first comment over and over.   Over-valuing looks in women is a way of objectifying them. It ties self-worth to appearance. It ties societal worth to appearance. Everything about the woman is superseded by appearance. 
Check out culantro. It tastes like what cilantro tastes like to those who don't have your "cilantro=soap" gene.
Hearts of Iron 4 is so good
The prologue is the text of the book she is reading/returning at the start of Episode 4 there are 2 of each.
Agreed. Funny bring subjective really isn't that hard a concept to grasp. Idk why people struggle with it when it comes to Chris. I don't care for Norm or Colin, but I recognize that they're killers in the comedy game.
I disagree. Trump will conquer the earth. Thus bringing Globalism. Then he will conquer every dimension. Thus bringing Dimensionalism.  Here's conclusive proof.  https://youtu.be/KSGwdZTXQFQ
Wow you have really been thru a lot !!  I'm also a chronic pain patient from loads of painful illnesses. Don't know What to tell you tho about the oxynorm. I've had to take OxyContin &amp; oxycodone daily for 20 yrs for severe chronic pain and I've also been very physically dependent. I've never gone a few days off my meds like you have but after Arizona recently changed MD prescribing opiate &amp; benzo laws, they've made me so angry I've tapered off OxyContin &amp; Xanax past couple months and now tapering off oxycodone. Not sure if I can exist off oxycodone but I'm sure going to try!  The Oxys did not control all my pain either even at very high dose.  You might want to try tapering off and then only using as needed.   Blessings you are in my prayers. You might try a little kratom to help w wd symptoms. Red vein works best for pain but it's addictive so be careful. I'm not a fan of kratom but if you run out of meds u might need something for the pain
I'm glad :-)
They picked the whitest dude ever in the UFC to match with Snoop Dogg?  This is one of those crazy ideas that just might work. 
I descended from sailors who conquered a continent. My ancestors literally built a town on a mountain 200 years ago and survived attacks by natives. Even fucked a few. On their own. No slaves as is the norm actually. Ironically, literally settled because a wagon wheel broke heading West so "fuck it want to start some civilization and shit? Build railroads and plumbing and all that?  So high five to Hungary  
If you're trying to be competitive you're gonna spend money even if there wasn't a keyboard. A good pair of headphones with decent soundstage will be $100+. An elite controller or that other brand $150+. The player base needs to be as large as possible since there are more and more quality games coming out splitting them. Especially with the more and more players switching to PC which affects the console player base 
What is this? And where can I find it
"Did I do that?" "Yes, Steve you did. You should probably turn back into Stefan and call a lawyer." 
says timur was a lot of the greatest extent of the greatest extent of the greatest extent of the greatest extent of the greatest extent of the greatest extent of the greatest extent of the greatest extent of the greatest extent of the greatest extent of the greatest extent of the greatest extent of the greatest extent of the greatest extent of the greatest extent of the greatest extent of the greatest extent of the greatest extent of the greatest extent of the greatest extent of the greatest extent of the greatest extent of the greatest extent of the
Best of luck with that. You should be able to do 1:1 easily. If that doesn't work out for you, reply to me in our epic trade thread, I may be able to help you out.
[Howard Johnson's So Fine](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=mpgjuhJiUbs) is the closest thing I could find - I'm not sure if that's the one, though.
No, that's it's always sunny.   For suits, every time they say "shit," you'll be hammered in no time. 
Also check out /r/neckbeardstories (sort by Top, since the good ones are really good, but the bad stories are really bad) and /r/justneckbeardthings and /r/mallninjashit
Is ricky playing in the Iceland open?
Why do so many people hate him in the community? Apart from the Bailly-nincompoop incident what did he do to deserve this? Just curious not hating btw
Like it. Where on your body did you go for?
Oh you will
But there is when you look at the whole range of possible views because there are only so many and they all broadly fit into a two axis scale, one for left and right, the other for libertarian versus authoritarian. There's tons of fudge factor to work with but ultimately when you're not stuck to the ideological spectrum of a single nation's politics it becomes clearer.
Oh yeah, the track's wet. 
Wait so are you going Warrior &gt; ER and not getting cleaver at all then? 
One can only hope. I know I'll probably get downvoted to hell but I haven't enjoyed his streams in awhile. The last time I really watched him was when he subbed in for Mythic last week. So much fun to watch. 
Yeah nice try Russia 
Come on man...we did this in March.   There have been sooooooooo many other dumb things said. Let's try to stay within a 60 day calendar. 
Thank you for your feedback.
I just feel like I don't gain anything much from reading about how some person bought a new car or is pissed off at the world.  In the past I would watch funny videos and pictures and read motivational quotes when in the end I should have been doing something more productive.  In the end, quotes don't work unless you do.  If someone really wanted to get in touch with me the relevant people know how to contact me.  
Yes yes yes!!! 100% yes!!
I've jazzed once from a bj and I'm 34. Doesn't mean I don't enjoy them. Don't be hard on yourself. 
Soon(TM).
So why should your smaller base be made even stronger without any thought or planning or farming?  Make a slightly bigger base if you're uncomfortable being "claustrophobic" 
Fuller pic: https://imgur.com/a/AxQLB  Will have TV mounted above fire place 
Only westerners who are too poor to afford an international school would put their kids in a local one. Generally, these people leave China when they have kids, because they want a better environment to raise them and can enjoy a good quality educationnal system for free in.their home country. So it's extremely rare ( for westerners at least). But when you're from Africa I can understand that living in China could bring your family a higher quality of life compared to what you get back home. It's clearly not the case for ANYONE who's from a developed country.
When I rode in an Uber with the stripper I hired for my boy's bachelor party. 
Thanks dad. 
Oh hell yes! You are wonderful!
Seems there are several of us with the same votes. Good taste all around.
Are they actually liking it? Mine wouldn't sit thru it
You are about to see alot more stars than a telescope can see... lol...  Prepare to walk on Mars and the Moon.
Yeah, hopefully.
Also can we get a list of how many seats each MP has? No more than three per person, please!
"I can't believe I've been running a macro for that long."
Hate to get on the wagon, but any kind soul want to include me in the activities would be greatly appreciated :)
But why not just make 10 the loudest?
Thank you. Wow. 
I'm trying to decide now between Aguilar OB-3 and the Darkglass
Okay I'm sorry
Wade and Melo are still mega stars?
http://www.gwentdb.com/decks/23756-global-rank-1-83-wr-fetch-the-axemen  This is the axeman deck T33th_ posted two days ago on this sub. Swim just showed this deck on his stream today, this is a very refined axeman deck that does really well against even counter decks. Soon ladder will be full of this cancer. The best counter so far is probably spell'tael, so we will see this meta until new patch hits.
Crazy if Pop gets his favorite player back AND has kawhi 3.0. 
When you add a user as your favorite, you can automatically go to all their creations without having to search for them. The next time you search on CC, scroll down to conditions and change 'ALL' to 'FAVORITES' and search.
Love this. I have soooo been there. But not anymore!  I'm not drinking with you tonight!
Sweet
You sure? I tend to stick with what I know instead of taking unnecessary risk. Are you saying I'll be good just using a burner phone?
Look this two  https://pcpartpicker.com/b/Gz7WGX https://pcpartpicker.com/b/rwcYcf
Afaik, Hawkeye increases critical rate?
I'm already there.
Mining urns max level is ~80. The others have max levels of 99
I love the fact that this looks significantly more like an actual issue of Time than the one Tronald Dump tried to pass off in actual establishments
You can only stack one free pass and one premium pass at a time, which means you can take part in two daily raids in a day for free. For that, obviously, you need to save a pass from the day before and, once you've used it, take a new one.
[m] how come you're never on the IRC anymore?
I'm not tolerating Nazis any fucking more. 
To be fair, every unique set of cards you could get ALSO has a 0.00034 chance of happening
Depends on the bird and season, if it's a magpie that things going to try and take out OPs eye
I once forgot the sugar in a vegan cake.  I ended up with a brick of a cake, completely inedible and that's before I mention the taste.  It happens, especially with something you've made before.   I also forgot the butter in some muffins, no one noticed that until we found the butter in the microwave the next day.
That a hand? I thought that was a ham and some sausage links
Pretty good little trap beat. If I could criticize anything it'd be the drums. They sound a bit stiff and synthetic. Throw a bit of reverb on them and experiment with the EQ and you'd be surprised at how much better they'd snap. The melody could use a bit of variation as well. You are solid on most of the fundamentals just keep playing around with settings and find your sound. 
Should there be an update? I'm on may 1st too. Tmobile
That's satan's work.
8
You've obviously shared a lot together and that's not something to be overlooked. I can't tell you what to do I can just tell you how I see it.  First of all reflect on yourself - have you had any desire for another girl at all, even jokingly? Have you ever felt attracted sexually to another girl? If no - your personalities, ideas of a relationship, are different. The future at this point is quite uncertain. People can't change who they really are down to the core, but a lot of outside factors can change how we behave including fear, sadness, opinions of other people, doubt, insecurity and so on. If yes - you can relate on why she did what she did.  As we grow up we certainly feel the need to explore and experience. I understand you might not feel the need to, already having everything you want, but a lot of other people out there need to go through this phase. Essentially it's a phase of discovering one self. It's a tough choice that only you can make no matter what your parents say. It's something you need to ask your inner self to answer. How hurt were you by what she did? Would you be ready to go through the same? Do you genuinely believe she regrets what she did? Just how much exactly do you love her? If you accept her back, would evetything be the same, can you forgive it? Is she really sorry, what keeps her from doing all this again? Answer yourself those questions, and answer them honestly. And remember when you do to actually listen to you. No fear or doubt, no effect of others opinions - just you. I think you might have a clearer view on things after. Good luck pal
Di di did you just assume what day of the week it was?
What's the nearest shopping centre? For clothing stores, homewares etc. 
So, so hypercarries carrying is actually being OP? We need to hurry and tell this to LCS teams so they pick up them more!
I caught a bit of it when it started and someone said Sarah sucks and he said yes sir she sure does 
K woukd love to fuck her.
Thanks 
He never taught me directly, but I still learned a lot from him. He was murdered when I was 2 months old and I only found out when I was about ten. Ever since then, I read newspaper articles about that day and I realise how suddenly and drastically lives can change in an instant. The decisions of one person created a fatherless child and impacted many more people. It really makes me appreciate the people around me, knowing that they could be gone tomorrow.
Non-scientific observation; perhaps as you've grown older the women in your dating pool have less options to justify their pickiness 
I would say this looks like you made this in MS Paint but tbh this is even worse lol
You got hit by automod, sorry I didn't catch it sooner. Fixed now. 
What???? This is a tragedy
Actually quails
Well anything is certainly possible. When they catch this fucker hopefully he can tell us why he clearly has no value for human life.
 1. /u/Itemblock  2. My Diablo 3 DLC for their Undertale and 2 Keys  3. https://www.reddit.com/r/SteamGameSwap/comments/6kj5e0/h_overwatch_starcraft_2_diablo_3_warcraft_w_steam/djmiph5/
I mean, didn't this happen before? Didn't Kendrick rap about it on The Heart Part 4?
How? If something is too strong and everyone gets a counter for it...what does it matter what the numbers say?  Nerfing something makes it weak compared to 100 other things.  Buffing one thing that is weak to another thing is more balanced.  Besides...My original comment was a word for word quote of Massive from 1.1. I figured most players would get it.  No nerfs. Only buffs.
I've never heard of Vanity as one of the sins. I think you're missing sloth too. 
You may have kickstarted ketosis, but fat adaptation takes several weeks or even months.
[Well I wouldn't call it an entrance...](http://i.imgur.com/tNQ1QvX.png)
Ok, but did you see that hidden cam video from the Acorn guy?
Yeah i read better a second time and after finding that other subject :  https://www.reddit.com/r/EliteDangerous/comments/6jtkhx/new_megaship_in_colonia_located_in_a_planets_ring/  I will check this out in game soon™.
Straight from *official White House statements*.
Shrek is on TNT right now immediately followed by Shrek 2 just FYI 
I don't hate the title, but I also don't love it. That being said it'll look good around Big Mike and hoping he wins and has the belt with him his Glory Pro show next weekend.
Jealous. I've wanted it since launch as the Telescopic is my primary weapon with about 25SS.
Hmmmm, I'm not too worried. I think that, taking into account the fact that we now have a loot system, at best it will be something like an extra rare, unique, sword and at worst something like, I dunno, mount skins or something? Honestly, I am not too worried. 
ASS TO ASS  oh wait, that's something else.  (TBK 4 life)
Female
I'll get there soon, Silver 2 at the moment but don't play enough despite a 62% wr over 60~ games.
Really depends the circumstances, parents had given me three options when I turned 18.  1. 18 live at home don't pay rent , all their rules apply. 2. 18 live at home pay below market rent, partial rules apply.  3. 18 live at home pay rent at market value, their rules don't  apply. 
i see your point. i was mostly trying to fit it into the "do you want…" meme
I'm obviously missing something, but I'm not sure what. Jon kept saying this game was 2 generations old, isn't it just one generation? RDR was on 360/PS3, current generation is Xbox One/PS4. One gen, right? What am I missing? 
Thank you
What's crossdressing?
Well not necessarily refuse but they try to lower my dose, try to convince me to retry a med that previously didn't work. I have to go in every month and pick up a paper prescription and they won't do it until the day I'm out. It's such a hassle and several times, several doctors have continually put me off and put me off when I need a refill and I end up going days without my meds. They just all act so hesitant to write the prescription, I think they are scared of getting their license revoked or something similar.
(▀̿Ĺ̯▀̿ ̿)   Thanks for the giveaway opportunity!
Oh, well as fun as that sounds, I guess I'll have to be strong this time and avoid the new gameplay. No spoilers for me. Hope you guys had a fun stream though.
I realize you're making a joke, but I've seen people in this sub essentially say this exactly. It usually comes out as "they should just work harder and stop being lazy". So far I've failed to get an answer to how a person who is bedridden from cancer or another debilitation illness is supposed to "just work harder". Do any nimble navigators want to answer that question?
Helping his brother-in-law's team get some runs.
+karma
hahaahahahha white people always want to feel persecuted. Its so fukking pathetic
I agree with /r/GotHicks.  Not a lot of FPS competition on the Switch.  Would I get it?  That depends if it's awesome enough to pull me away from Splatoon 2.  Give it LAN and local co-op goodness and I'd give it a try.  
Aw man, no Centipedes?
Burning to death. 
&gt; Even though I have the ability to pick up on other people's emotions, I often have little desire to get involved or I just literally don't know what I could do to help.  Basically most INTPs
/u/tryshapepper has now repaid /u/IgrewAtomato $410.00   Updated loans (loans that have changed from this transaction):  Lender|Borrower|Amount Given|Amount Repaid|Unpaid?|Original Thread|Date Given|Date Paid Back :--|:--|:--|:--|:--|:--|:--|:-- IgrewAtomato|tryshapepper|360.00|70.00||[Original Thread](https://www.reddit.com/r/borrow/comments/6f32tu/reqhouston_tx_usapaypal360prearranged/)|Jun 3, 2017| IgrewAtomato|tryshapepper|50.00|50.00||[Original Thread](https://www.reddit.com/r/borrow/comments/6eoona/reqhouston_tx_usapaypal50prearranged/)|Jun 1, 2017|Jun 30, 2017 IgrewAtomato|tryshapepper|240.00|240.00||[Original Thread](https://www.reddit.com/r/borrow/comments/6cr7g6/reqhouston_tx_usa240paypal62prearranged/)|May 22, 2017|Jun 30, 2017 IgrewAtomato|tryshapepper|50.00|50.00||[Original Thread](https://www.reddit.com/r/borrow/comments/6b4tti/reqhouston_tx_usapaypal50526_prearranged/)|May 14, 2017|Jun 30, 2017   ^($0.00 ignored)
about 2
How interesting, thanks for the read.   By the way, I think that the parachute mines are the most plausible theory.
considering the average quality of LN translation...that's just not going to happen and most manga is translated slower(unless it's old manga) than anime gets aired
Brian Williams' on-air orgasm over the cruise missile launch footage was particularly disgusting. I can't imagine how anyone could fail to recognize propaganda that egregious. Unfortunately, it seems the erosion of confidence in corporate media is being better exploited by the right than the left.
?
Why would someone do that? 
The big one for me is the salt in fast food.  I still eat Taco Bell value menu stuff from time to time (the calories on the menu make it easy), but the salt is so high that it really just isn't good for me.  Cutting back now.
Exciting!  I was planning on going with Wittenberg to get a quicker surgery date, but I just called to set my consult, and they said both Satterwhite and Wittenberg were booking consults for October 2018, with surgery over a year after!  Yikes!
Even the driving physics look good.
S/O to your dad, especially if he doesn't know anything about sneakers and took his time to read up on it and get you this. either way your dad seems really cool
&gt; less randomness = less novel games, randomness means solving new problems each time.  You've got to be fucking kidding me.
Driveclub, although I bought it on special so it's not too bad.   Eve Valkyrie, I just don't play it. I played a few missions and got spammed with so many enemies and I could hit anything. I love Star Wars though.   Starblood arena. It's a good game, and I love decent. I would love a single player game with similar gameplay (although not an arena shooter). I guess the initial matchmaking problems turned me off. I'm in Australia and I never found a game. Gave up in the end. 
My amazing boyfriend is also my boy. We are equals until it comes time to play. In theory it should be triggered by something like him putting on his collar but in practice we know eachother well and so there's a little mental switch we flick. It might be me pinning him down playfully and him saying "thank you sir" and then it's on. For the record, there's a decent chance your Dom is as nervous about this as you are - he might be worried you aren't looking for a boyfriend and feel that he needs to remain the big bad dom in order to keep you. In other words - communicate for fucks sake! 😈
At Arby's you get cancer when you ring the bell, so it's a little different.
I see your logic, was just curious if there was a reason I wasn't aware of.
We do it your "previous" way.  We're a smaller library and our "waiting to be shelved" books are split onto three carts.  The vast, vast, vast majority of shelving is done by our two pages and they move the books one section at a time onto their smaller carts and then push the smaller cart around the stacks.
That Twitter handle was Seth Richs reddit handle 
Would you like to talk to me about our lord and savior the shitpost section?
r/FreeGamesOnSteam offers a LOT of freebies, that's how it shows I have that many games (and free games that add +1 to your library)
There should be an edit button under the text you wrote.
This post didn't even last a second.
Gonna help a brotha out (Confirmed with google)  The battle of Thermopylae.   Part of the thing was that was two small forces, one a naval and the other the land force. It was an amazing gambit that the 2 300 movies only slightly managed to capture the scale of.
Right right, so does Hillary exemplify the democratic party as a whole as well? Of course not. Some people are socially conservative and economically/politically liberal, and vice versa. By no means is yours a correct statement.
If I know it's a roundabout or junction where a lot of lorries or buses go past I'm gonna keep the bike upright even if it means I have to lean off the bike myself a bit. And instead of accelerating through the corner I will just maintain more of a steady speed so that I have more evenly distributed traction on my tyres. If it's been raining slightly it also brings the oils out to the surface so I'll do the same thing then too. This is different to after a heavy downpour, when it washes the roads and then I'll generally ride a bit harder.
Just get your grandma an iPhone 7 or something. I don't like it when Apple dumbs things down for idiots
he's .500 against you in the regular season; same with Cardinals, Panthers and Packers
#[H] 420 Keys [W] £350
Great, i need rest.
I live very comfortably, am self employed and no debt. Your position is fallacious.
I wouldn't say it's great actually... I just enjoy people crying over it xD
Live in Florida, Younger than nam, can confirm handjobs.
Friendship ended with Jeff Teague.
If I'm having a string of those days I try to wake up early so I can watch TV before work for a little while.  Watching other people be normal makes me feel a little more ready for the day eventually.  I like Desperate Housewives the ABC original series, puts me in a pleasant mood.  I know waking up early those days sounds impractical but it's much easier when you know you're only going to watch TV for a couple hours.  If I'm caught off guard by it I make sure to shower, brush my teeth, and I'm a big proponent of make up especially in this context.   Not applicable to many men but, maybe comb your hair or shave would be similar? That's my brain fog day management routine.  Doing that makes me look like a human being on the outside, which I've found is enough to get through work despite no feelings on the inside.  I've managed to do those 3 things just about every morning for at least a year now, despite brain fog days.  I think because I've told myself for so long that I'll manage as long as I do those three things, it works.  Maybe find a few things that make you feel human, tell yourself they will make you feel human, and after doing them for a while it might work!  That said, I feel okay taking a needed day off work.  Sometimes it's just not gonna happen.
trump doesnt know anything .. literally.   there is no way that imbecile would have taken the stance on climate change without being told to (because it is unlikely he even knew what it was).  pulling out of the accord is a gop imperative. trump is boasting "proud" not so much because he is stupid, but because it makes his supporters feel good about puffing murica's chest out.
[](/user/FedExFacto)  Please post any comments *that are not a photoshop* as a reply to this comment and leave the top of the thread for original content. I, Bot, removed my first comment to keep this nest at the bottom of the page.   ---  [**Click for Photoshop Battles "Best of 2016" Results!**](https://www.reddit.com/r/photoshopbattles/comments/5mstw6/photoshop_battles_best_of_2016_results/)  ---  Other subreddits for 'shoppers: /r/cutouts, /r/battleshops  [^Posting ^a ^cutout? ^Please ^read ^this.](/r/cutouts/wiki/index#wiki_flair.3A)  ^(Helpful links for this image:) [^Other ^Discussions](https://www.reddit.com/r/photoshopbattles/related/6kjs8p/psbattle_senator_richard_shelby/) ^| [^KarmaDecay](https://karmadecay.com/r/photoshopbattles/comments/6kjs8p/psbattle_senator_richard_shelby/) ^| [^Google ^Image ^Search](https://www.google.com/searchbyimage?&amp;image_url=http://i.imgur.com/ffzpmoC%2ejpg)   ---  *^(This is an automated response)* [^FAQ](http://www.reddit.com/r/apicontraptions/wiki/apicontraption_faq) ^| [^Send ^Feedback](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=apicontraption&amp;subject=Feedback ___thingId___&amp;message=[Link to post](https://www.reddit.com/r/photoshopbattles/comments/6kjs8p/psbattle_senator_richard_shelby/\) 'I like feedback')
Obviously Grepher. Angus doesn't have arms.
im pretty skinny and have never really had to loose weight
I'm not exactly sure 
FA is closer to FZ than UBW is, but it is still not Gen's pesudo intellectualism. However if you expect heros punching the s*it out of each other, than it is for you.
L
Thats true, but on the spreadsheet its considered that the profit with, lets say, mana potion cask is 50k - cask price. Thats not really true because you are not paying 50k in the potions from NPC, you are only paying 45k because you will sell the flasks.  The thing is, the wasting 5 gps per potion comes from the fact that, if you did it the other way (buying from NPC) you would get 5gps from it.
Setting timer now!
My religious uncle gave me my first smoke out!
Most cities are controlled by Democrats, that's generally how the demographic makeup is split in America. I'm sure it can't be surprising to you that there's more crime in cities than outside of them...
Alfie's voice is too much for me to handle. Can't do it unfortunately. 
That's why you trust in what medical professional knows what is in your best interest at that time. It would be impossible to know what is best in that scenario unless you went through an equal amount of education.   Even women themselves won't possibly know what hidden damage this procedure may or may not be doing to them. This is the basis for scientific progress.  My old history teacher put it best "How the fuck would Billy in a trench in 1917 know what the fuck happened at the Somme more than an historian who dedicated his MOTHERFUCKING life to it"
OK, lets find 10,000 people who acted like Philiando Castille, and 10,000 people who are clearly non-compliant, and see what the **average outcome** is for both groups.    I mean, what happened in that situation is terrible, but are you seriously trying to say that because of that incident, you shouldn't even bother complying?  That's fucking terrible advice if that is what you mean.   Furthermore, I said a pretty decent amount of police brutality videos involve blatant non compliance.  I did NOT say "literally every police brutality situation involves non compliance and literally everybody who complied has always been treated properly.   I'm legitimately confused, what logical point are you trying to make?    ___________   What the fuck is with the downvotes?  Are at least 8 people actually trying to say that compliance is not on average much safer than non compliance?
I believe in karma. Not like its some mystical force of balance or anything, but rather the idea that helping others will lead to more situations of people willing to help you in the future, or that just being a good person is something that other people around you can see.  A lot of the moments in my life that were saved by the generosity of another person, came about as a result of the choices Ive made in the past 
Enjoy your pain relief frient 🌲👌🏻
You jelly?
  Damon did not flinch.   “And one not easily slighted, fortunately for you.”
Yes! And I already had the Giants gear to blend right in!
Hope it was declawed!
I think you have to give a nod to the announcing as well. They aren't trying to simplify and educate on every lap, pretend it's more exciting than it is, or assume we have no idea who any of these drivers are.   It's matter of fact commentary, and they're doing it well so far. 
Lapadula is easily better than Borini
^(Hi, I'm a bot for linking direct images of albums with only 1 image)  https://i.imgur.com/fETZwaN.jpg  ^^[Source](https://github.com/AUTplayed/imguralbumbot) ^^| ^^[Why?](https://github.com/AUTplayed/imguralbumbot/blob/master/README.md) ^^| ^^[Creator](https://np.reddit.com/user/AUTplayed/) ^^| ^^[state_of_imgur](https://np.reddit.com/r/u_imguralbumbot/comments/6i1huv/imgur_has_gone_to_shit) ^^| ^^[ignoreme](https://np.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=imguralbumbot&amp;subject=ignoreme&amp;message=ignoreme) ^^| ^^[deletthis](https://np.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=imguralbumbot&amp;subject=delet%20this&amp;message=delet%20this%20djml1rh) 
I can imagine you doing that, hah. It would be awesome if a bigger YouTuber could scout out channels like basketball teams do.
S
I can, I guess. I do have some really nice looking clothes, but I prefer to just feel comfortable. Plus I don't really do a lot of things that would require me to be well dressed. And in my job, I shouldn't be well dressed at all, it'd be stupid to do so.
OMG JEALOUS
Just what we need... another right wing.
OP made a generalization that is not true.  In the US, There are many Universities located in major metro areas as well as ones in smaller towns .
That's so great, I honestly don't understand why a chick would want to be with a dude instead of another girl, deeply grateful they do though.
Oh great! Thank you for including the French one too (did you read my mind lol)  Man it sucks that people are staging/fabricating these attacks, they must not realize that it delegitimizes their cause.
Right, they are inflating his threat level
... and if we don't get no tolls, we don't get no rolls...
My hsg was read as normal by radiology but per the re who did it it was not. I ended up with an ex lap where they found thick mucus in that Fallopian tube that they easily got rid of.   My ex lap was billed under endo and fully covered by insurance. 
Fun fact there are more guns in America than people so really it's WAY over 100m people 
Nice cock bro! Nice load, you're quite the shooter 💦💦😜
This doesn't jive with the narrative white boy.   Get that logic and shit tf outa here 
Nothing that person posted was any evidence of that, and Nvidia just rolled out DX12 for Fermi cards.  https://www.reddit.com/r/hardware/comments/6kitjv/nvidia_quietly_rolls_out_dx12_support_for_fermi/  Not saying they don't gimp, but here's evidence on the contrary.
Don't see Bale, Isco, or Case tbh.
Yeah, using a proper pot will really increase your yields/plant size/health/etc so it is a must for sure!   your pots look like 0.25-0.5 gallon nursery pots, which is a huge bottleneck in your grow.   Definitely go with smart pots too, they blow away a normal pot any day! With 50% perlite in my soil and smart pots, I achieved about DWC levels of veg growth speed which is about 1-2" a day on every top/node. All of the oxygen in my rootzone from all that perlite and the smart pots is directly responsible for this! DWC works so well for the same reason, it prodives a ghuge amount of oxygen to your rootzone. 
You dropped this:  /s
I'm loving it, I feel like we haven't had a proper winter yet and we've already passed the shortest day!
I know that not evey epic has , but those that actually affect damage do - mammoth ,kbar invective , and many others , and I dont think it rechambers slower
I'm a huge rally fan and my whole world changed as a kid when my dad told me people had to pick fingers from the rad scoops of a Metro 6r4.  I was watching when Senna died, had experiences of a few other motorsport heroes dying, especially in motorbike Road Racing, but nothing prepared me for that comment.  I still remember I was watching a Duke VCR about GrpB and he was standing in the doorway between the kitchen and living room when he told me.   Innocence gone, just in one comment.  
This is bad.....
You don't need descriptions. Ignore post above. You need to update your game and it will automatically install. Then once you load save all quests will pop up then the chests will be there.
I would rather die than fuck my nails up tbh
#TUCKER TIME!
&gt; DÄPP DÄPP JOHNNY DÄPP DÄPP!   Aber scheiß drauf! G20 ist nur einmal im Jahr! 
*diabolical laughter*  *diabolical acting*
He's one of those guys that has a lot going for him and not much against him. The l85 is an amazing rifle; good damage, slowish rate of fire, and stupidly easy to control recoil. The smg11 is a great secondary, and it gives him a nice cqb backup since most sledge players are going acog on the l85. Frags for kill potential or more often to dispose of barbed wire. And the biggest reason is the vertical gameplay meta. Sledges hammer makes it easy to open reliable sized holes above the objective and make it easier to maintain control over an objective. If you watch the pro league, you'll see that it's actually not very common to use the hammer to open up walls because it just gives the roamers a free rotation hole more often than not.
Narrator|Total Votes|Books| :--|:--|:--| Tim Gerard Reynolds|65|Riyria, Legends of the First Empire, Red Queen's War, Cycle of Arawn, Silo Saga (Wool)| Michael Kramer|56|Stormlight, Wheel of Time, Mistborn, Rithmatist| Michael Page|50|Gentleman Bastards, Malazan, Best Served Cold| Kate Reading|44|Stormlight, Wheel of Time, Codex Alera| James Marsters|43|Dresden, Vampire Empire| Simon Vance|39|Tigana, Lightbringer, Temeraire, Dune, Kushiel| Steven Pacey|30|First Law| Neil Gaiman|25|all his own books| Stephen Fry|24|Harry Potter, Hitchhiker's Guide| Jim Dale|21|Harry Potter, Night Circus| Nick Podehl|21|Kingkiller, King's Dark Tidings, Moontide Quartet| George Guidall|14|Dark Tower, American Gods, Golem and the Jinni| Rupert Degas|13|Kingkiller, Metro 2033| Wil Wheaton|13|Ready Player One, Fuzzy Nation, Redshirts| Jay Snyder|12|Hyperion, Six of Crows, Speed of Dark| Victor Bevine|12|Hyperion, Legend of Drizzt| Kobna Holdbrook-Smith|11|Peter Grant, Poseidon's Children| Macleod Andrews|10|Black Company, Reckoners, Sandman Slim| Stephen Briggs|10|Discworld|
Creation won't go to uncapped status until 4.2, barring a significant change in how they've handled tomestones up to now.
5 Walks so far, this isn't good.
It's solely for the money. I think a small part would be regrouping/ seeing how many of your fans actually follow you to another platform, such as YouTube, but it seems Youtube is better in every other way except for money for streamers. Besides, you are allowed to stream on multiple platforms at once- Twitch is only gaming. You can do gaming on twitch and irl on YouTube, but not gaming on both.
You should also post this to twitter.
I guess it doesn't. But wait, Steve Buscemi just so happens to be a producer on this movie seems odd doesn't it? Didn't Steve Buscemi just so happen to be at one of the biggest staged incidents in the world 9/11? Now why would Steve Buscemi just so happen to be smack dab in the middle of the two largest conspiracies in the whole world? And isn't it a little weird how Steve Buscemi just so happens to be a talented actor and worth millions of dollars, seems like he might've had quite a few connections to get funding like that, now wait a minute, if you look at his filmography he just so happened to be in spy kids 2, in which he is a scientist stuck on an island ruled by his own creations. Now why would he be in a movie about spys if it wasn't a message, maybe a cry for help that his own wrong doings have trapped him and now he must get help to take down what he created? That's right Steve Buscemi and Louis C.K. are teaming up to take down the GOP right from the inside of Washington D.C. but why? To get revenge for 9/11 of course.
Eminem is more popular than DMX. Is that simple enough for you?
Why does it look like he's wearing clownshoes before he gets hit? It's really bothering me. I know shadows are a thing but they look too elongated. 
everyone except like 20 players are overpaid
I'm super down for it, but agree that they should be hazardous in some way - flooded with chlorine or polluted water, for example, or perhaps just covered in germs (Since that's a thing now.) Enemies and combat opportunities would be nice too.
Lies. They hit me with lies!
It's not a problem to go to Mass without going to confession if you don't receive communion. Obviously it would be a good thing to not be in the state of mortal sin.
His kids? But they are both men.
I've seen 1 timely in the MB before. It's good against burn but its also potentially good to recover from a boardwipe (if they play a creature after) or after chump blocking. Seems like pretty often you could get use out of it anyways.
Because even the liberal voters here have struck down income taxes time and time again.  This is the result.
That's because of people like her that nobody got a nes classic 
Using the internet 
I don't even think Shroud is a good player though, so what makes you say that I am a "shroud cock sucker" as you put so elegantly?
what do you mean?in term of fashion,ruling or for story?  in term of fashion i think she will look good  in term of ruling i think she will have a hard time because for most of westeros opinion about the war..the lannister were the good guys protectiong the realm from a  cruel foreigner leading a army of savage dothraki, cruel pirates (greyjoy) etc...  she will be weaker since i believe ALL or 2/3 dragon wil die during the great war i see many assasination attempt toward her..just like aegon the conqueror   for the story? i will have a "meh" reaction because they were bassicaly no red herring or twist in the books or show who lead to that moment it was predicted wince book 1 and  will lack of originality
Those are reds, I believe. 
Please tell me Pogba isn't your striker. His finishing stat is awful, and it feels worse than that in game. 
Yes you do quiet before gulag
Also, 2 k-return is too few to survive against aggro decks. You might also need more threat diversity if you're going in on the delirium plan. There's the newly spilled red bomb with a mass wipe stapled to it for instance to traverse for
Haha thanks, going with half the weights I used to do, don't want to get another injury (⇀‸↼‶)
He's gotta put in his hours practicing LoL
We may actually get more stones since global doesn't do the twitter stuff.
Usually the symptoms are extreme pain in the upper right side of your abdomen near your ribs and sometimes right shoulder blade pain. Usually shows up 30min-3 hours after a high fat meal.   I am having to get mine out but it is not weight loss related. 
Neither. I work in tech.  So as a consumer I get it -i know if i want to make the most money with the sale, I have to put in the hours. 
If only it were that easy. I am confused every time. I think they want to surprise me, so won't get me what I ask for. Edit: Removed my sarcastic "I hadn't thought of that..." comment that started my response. :)
That's... impossible.
So 2 steel overseers main. Gota ask why. 
I think you meant to ask the other dude not me 
Dope!!!!! See if they can coordinate an AMA with us. 
A big red paper dot attatched to your clothes. I think it had something to do with Halloween, and a twister costume.
Idk if she's trash tier, I got 3 kills before level 5 in one game last night. 
I saw this a while ago on facebook, looked at her profile, and the rest of her posts are just as batshit fucking crazy.
That's fair. 
&gt; I'm sorry that happened to you.  Shit happens :)
Is that a picture of an UpTrump?  I have tons of those.  I use them cautiously, but liberally when necessary.  
Huh, whaddya know. Unsubbed too.
FCA is the primary shareholder of Ferrari.  It would be correct to say FCA owns Ferrari.
Whered you get the patch?
I grew up a Sega kid, so I went from genesis to Dc. 
The parent mentioned [**Critical Thinking**](http://legaliq.com/Definition/Critical_Thinking). For anyone unfamiliar with this term, **here is the definition:**^\(In ^beta, ^be ^kind)  ****  Critical thinking is described by Richard Paul as a movement in two waves (1994). The "first wave" of critical thinking is often referred to as a 'critical analysis' that is clear, rational thinking involving critique. Its details vary amongst those who define it. According to Barry K. Beyer (1995), critical thinking means making clear, reasoned judgments. During the process of critical thinking, ideas should be reasoned, well thought out, and judged. The National Council for Excellence in Critical Thinking defines critical thinking as the ... [[View More](http://legaliq.com/Definition/Critical_Thinking)]  ****  ^(**See also:**) [^Wave](http://legaliq.com/Definition/Wave) ^| [^Rational](http://legaliq.com/Definition/Rational) ^(**Note**: The parent poster ) ^\(old\_saggers\_r\_sexy ^or ^Wearing-A-Wig) ^can [^delete ^this ^post](/message/compose?to=LawBot2016&amp;subject=Deletion+Request&amp;message=cmd%3A+delete+reply+t1_djlq438) ^| [^**FAQ**](http://legaliq.com/reddit)
We stand here amidst ***OUR*** memes! ***NOT THEIRS***
Srs- seems that apology video was all that was needed for them to be open it about now.
Its a shame he didn't go for Red Hill Ave... there have been a few pilots over the years who have resorted to that street for emergency landings... based on his approach before that last banked turn he may have been better off doing so but I've also never seen that potential approach from that altitude and angle...  ... and hindsight is always 20/20, juts glad nobody dies outright...
not unless you wack someone with it, then it's an improvised weapon
THIS IS AU-RA
Feel free to add me. My psn is SerThatcher 
This post is too short, a minimum of 75 characters is required. We appreciate you sharing your thoughts, but maybe you could repost and expand more on what you are trying to say. Or perhaps your post really belongs in one of the stickied daily threads or the Q&amp;A/troubleshooting megathread?  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/pokemongo) if you have any questions or concerns.*
I'm so confused. How is she "making you" watch her kids? And why in the world does she think $20 a day is appropriate compensation?
It's totally messed up, but not illegal.  I own a business in an industry that typically offers such incentives to new clients but we don't.  I always let people know that we do offer discounts and other specials to returning clients only.  Many of our clients appreciate that.
Considering the date I feel like it should be just red and white 🇨🇦🇨🇦🇨🇦
Still in the same price range, so it's fine.
Awesome, your photos got me stoked
I want to use either a wand of fireballs or wand of lightning bolts in my off hand.
Have you considered his interview with C4? https://www.reddit.com/r/MChannel4/comments/6iwolz/the_road_to_holyrood_part_1_a_chat_with/
basically how is anyone supposed to get anything done with these girls here. 
[trihard jacksfilms](#trihard "trihard") 99  99!
Not really. My first exposure to music in general was Lorde.  Although, Lorde made me branch to indie first before pop.
You hugged?? he definitely doesn't seem like a hugger.
Needs more jpeg
Time to see if Le pen truly is mightier than le sword.
I remember last year, I went to see them at msg during wintour. Because of this I obviously slept in after being out late. However, the boys were playing another show the day the msg show at Foxwoods in upstate CT. Apparently, while I was sleeping in my dad went to the store and while he was on the highway he saw two page gold buses with a screen in front that had FOB in giant letters head in the direction of Foxwoods. So basically long story short my dad saw Fall Out Boy's tour buses heading to a show while I was still sleeping in because of the concert the night before 
if they go to Brazil Game Show that would be cool too
Well, there's voter ID laws that aren't accompanied by policies that ensure that all voters can obtain such IDs without undue hardship or inconvenience--you know, the thing we're talking about in this thread. Gerrymandering is another one.
I wouldn't mind having my province on my flair. This has crossed my mind as well. And might be helpful in Sunday Swap.
Pull the battery off the drone use the password underneath it
Sounds like a perfect fit!
YES. THANK YOU!
I'm an electronic technician by trade and recently I've been getting into robotics as a hobby/potential future profession so I'd be happy to learn about anything in the field from someone who is enthusiastic enough about their work to want to teach it. What would be good to know beforehand?
The show took a turn the moment they killed Locke. 
To my understand if he was playing with a 4k he would then be 5k. Maybe I missunderstand. Still have not ONCE had a non international ranked player in international ranked, is this only a party queue issue?
Woah that's hardcore. Well maybe you're just past the age of morning wood and spontaneous boners? Idk your age though. 
Yhpm
They're not showing up on the map - the chain starts by the crashed Post Awful van just before the turnoff to the trailer park on the road along the west coast.  Just ran the chain last night.  Still awesome after all these years.
Wow cool joke mate. 
Nope :))))))
Man, I wish we got a full series of Diesel. I think I would have learned a lot
Hm. Dissapointing.  Nevertheless, you shall continue.  [(~lazuli~)](/ss)  [(~this ~ is ~ a ~ powerful ~ tool ~ here~)](/ss)  [(~together ~ we ~ must ~ master ~ it ~ in ~ order ~ to ~ survive~)](/ss)  You drag those aforementioned machines down to the ground, placing them in a line spanning out across Lazuli's horizon, away from her lusus.  /u/BraveOcelot
What about the others you responded to in a less than savory way? They don't count? 😘 
Zoos make me sad.
got 600k to spare? I'd list tots Hamsik
I can tell.
If that is the case then I will be happy. But if it's cap space for Teague kill me now. 
I was going for a facetious "that's a waste of meth" but it didn't translate well. Either way, it's a stupid drug to do. But I highly doubt either of the people featured were on meth.
Yeah, if it's just the school year/length of program, I don't think it's a big deal either. 
**Attention! [Serious] Tag Notice**  * Jokes, puns, and off-topic comments are not permitted in **any** comment, parent or child.  * Parent comments that aren't from the target group will be removed, along with their child replies.   * Report comments that violate these rules.  Posts that have few relevant answers within the first hour, and posts that are not appropriate for the [Serious] tag will be removed. Consider doing an AMA request instead.  Thanks for your cooperation and enjoy the discussion!   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/AskReddit) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Jesus. Yea I wish I doubled up on all of em and then waited. Woulda basically had em for free and still had enough cash left over to buy boost 
Looks like there might be a condom in there.
my 1983 280zx doesn't has high, low, and a clickless knob for the intermitent. Literally thousands of settings.
I'm so excited. I booked my hotel like six months ago
I miss that guy so much and feel awful for what they've done with his name. Long live Andrew Breitbart.
Is Carrasco still pitching tomorrow?
Love it.
Do I need to play WitchSpring 1 for any story continuity, or is the 2nd one self-contained?
yeah it's always easy to forget these guys get insane amounts of money to have one of the best jobs in the world (IMO). plus most fans will have plenty of fond memories of him from 2016, myself included. 
That's impressive getting his car 6 feet underground. 
I would watch the hell out of a "Klay in China" reality show.
I just watched the video. Worst host ever. He interrupts Arthur every other word. Hard to take seriously.
Casserole dog.
We need more elected Republicans like Senator Grassley - MAGA. 
This is the only correct answer.   Other shit is just fine a fuck up your garments. 
Fat Nick Hexum
I have next to zero problems with front squats.  They don't hurt, I can breathe, etc.  At first they were awkward.  Just a counterpoint to the "front squats are the worst thing in the universe" meme.
I never saw it that way because I'm bring dragged into a life style and seeing things I thought I would never ever see or be part of. This was great 
The Republican party calls themselves conservatives.   By literal definition, it is not progressive.   &gt; holding to traditional attitudes and values and cautious about change or innovation, typically in relation to politics or religion.
What if someone thinks you're a degenerate?  
Electric Dolphin Sleepover
Hope it was worth it.
Plenty of comments here hitting the mark, so just some notes on terminology:  * "Bass side" or "bass buttons" refers to the left hand side of the accordion.  Some sets of reeds on the bass side are often tuned higher than those on the "treble" side.  * "Bass" when used on a treble side register switch, as in your photograph, refers to the lowest-sounding reed block on the treble side.  Sometimes also called the "Bassoon" setting.  I would not personally refer to this as a "bass" set of reeds, to avoid confusion -- maybe just call it your lowest set of reeds on the treble side.  Wordy but accurate.  * Your accordion has two individual sets of reeds (each set in its own reed block) on the treble side.  You haven't shown any info on the bass side, but I would guess that it has four sets of reeds (set in two reed blocks).  If so, this would be referred to in shorthand as a 2/4 LM accordion.  * Bass reed blocks usually have two different sets of reeds per block, unlike treble reed blocks.  Each set of 12 reeds is a different voice.  Each treble reed blocks has just one set of reeds, but spanning 2+ octaves.  * Fun aside: your accordion's register switch symbols are upside-down.  
Seriously speaking, "Good Game" would go over with me so much better than "GG &lt;3"
I just like my horn to beep and lights flash.
Was -- was he doing the splits?
YES
Germany is playing as well as all countries think their top level is.
&gt;The Scott Trust became a limited company in 2008, with a constitution to maintain the same protections for The Guardian. **Profits are reinvested in journalism rather than to the benefit of an owner or shareholders.**  https://en.m.wikipedia.org/wiki/The_Guardian
Your going to struggle to play them with an xbox controller
Yay! 
Darn beat me to it
I know nobody gives a damn about someone else's fantasy team, but this is the second Yankees game against one of my opponent's SPs this wk  First one was against Quintana...hopefully Yankees do **a lot better** against McCullers
I've had an off week after celebrating the end of my exams, starting back my routine tomorrow, Got to go back and punish myself like papa Brett told me too, trying to beat my PB for 5k of 22.06- thanks for asking :D
Yeh man. Wipe the field and every player with infinite untaps on top of them being an easy way to get mana. One damage to a player is one mana so all of your pingers become mana dorks. 
I'm not even mad at the honesty. I don't know if people will offer but at least you put it out there.
Gotcha, I figured as much  Now all the other shitposters are gonna hate me 😁
Hitting someone is still assault.
Hallo my name is Mathoo and I am calling from Mars base because ve have detected problems vith your vindows pc
Typically doesn't end until at least sunset.
They're going for Blake Griffin. Then grab an average point who can space the floor. 
I wasn't even aware what 'pop music' was at the same, I just thought all music was... 'music' 
i'm a simple girl, i read "the quest for", i click  congratulations &lt;3 'dream team' is accurate af and i hope initial mari ssr comes to you eventually bc i know how frustrating it is to be missing one random card. job dia is my favorite aqours UR too &lt;3
Videos in this thread:  [Watch Playlist &amp;#9654;](http://subtletv.com/_r6kizyt?feature=playlist&amp;nline=1)  VIDEO|COMMENT -|- [FORTNITE MORE SKINS/CARDS !! BASKETBALL SKIN !! FORTNITE](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=PHlIG833uzM&amp;t=280s)|[+1](https://www.reddit.com/r/FORTnITE/comments/6kizyt/_/djml17u?context=10#djml17u) - There are 4 classes.  Within the classes, you have a rarity (color) which determines your maximum potential (similar to weapons) and a subclass (which determines abilities).  Note this video - which shows a few characters: The immediate link shows... (1) [DJ Mustard/Kid Ink Type Beat - Down For (Prod. by Omito)](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=evV2Q-bsLps) (2) [Arman Cekin - California Dreaming (ft. Paul Rey)](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=TpJHlRvaxm4)|[+1](https://www.reddit.com/r/FORTnITE/comments/6kizyt/_/djml19h?context=10#djml19h) - SECTION CONTENT Title FORTNITE MORE SKINS/CARDS !! BASKETBALL SKIN !! FORTNITE   Description ● FORTNITE MORE SKINS !! BASKETBALL SKIN !! FORTNITE  ● How was that video FaithArmy! If you enjoyed, make sure you land on that like button and remember ... I'm a bot working hard to help Redditors find related videos to watch. I'll keep this updated as long as I can. *** [Play All](http://subtletv.com/_r6kizyt?feature=playlist&amp;ftrlnk=1) | [Info](https://np.reddit.com/r/SubtleTV/wiki/mentioned_videos) | Get me on [Chrome](https://chrome.google.com/webstore/detail/mentioned-videos-for-redd/fiimkmdalmgffhibfdjnhljpnigcmohf) / [Firefox](https://addons.mozilla.org/en-US/firefox/addon/mentioned-videos-for-reddit)
When I was a single male, I never spent any time in my bedroom except to sleep. Take #1, and don't waste space in the BR. #1 has more space and a better layout to entertain if you want to have 4 or 8 people over. 
Yeah, we all need to take one giant chill pill. 
Thanks man!
Just look up "how a differential works" in youtube. There is an old black and white video, that one is great.  Im too lazy to do it, but if someone else does for me i have an updoot with their name on it.
Wade is special imo. He will jump to the NBA as soon as he gets a shot.   Enjoy the ride in the meantime... dude is legit. 
It's disabled temporary, it's coming back.
He isn't talking about that, he is talking about bugs being patched with updates, but he made it seems like the updates immediately brick device (without user input)
&gt;1 or 2 team arrow members may die  BUT WHO IS IN THE GRAVE?!?!?!
Tiger pounce, allergy kicks in, OP sneezes, tiger is startled and leaves, OP saved by allergies. 
Even if you're white! I know cops ask for some fucky shit sometimes, but you really need to listen to them.
Well, at least in [Kimi no Nawa](/s "The timeline was saved and Yukino survived, as she was a teacher in that town. That got hit with the comet.")
Will check back when I get home and can actually trade 
He's goes to the same barber as LeBron. Maybe they can both be in Brooklyn 
"Badassssssssss" 🐍  
Loooool that would be amazing
Don't have ta be a jerk about it
That's not what intelligence is.  You are confusing intelligence for having gone to school.  They are not the same.
I read the bio and I didn't get that at all. It's actually seems intentionally vague.
Congress looks at Trump like a patsy, they are not going to jump because he says so.
I was devoted to my job I guess :)
Whoa what a coincidence For Report Aboose is also my favorite band
&gt; Hand of Thrawn duology.  These were pretty good, I enjoyed them a lot. Hope you enjoy them too! You've read the Thrawn trilogy, right?
So you think criminals should get to kill cops? Is that what you're saying? Obviously they aren't innocent if they're reaching for an officer's gun or attacking him. Or shooting him in the face. 
[Quest of the Demoknight](https://youtu.be/_pVMVPJVVV4)
Drools, my goodness.
The bridge is low and clearly marked. The trucking company got fined.
I know I was salty :p
Me too thanks
Your post has been removed because it did not meet the minimum post length. Please remember to put some effort into your submissions!  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/AgeplayPenPals) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Dan's gonna love this chick.
Yeah this is false. Theres sports rivalries and lots of un Pc jokes but they dont have hatred.  Stop spewing bs out of your mouth.
Why doesn't Cleveland go for him?
Fun fact, [WotC is doing *exactly* this for Iconic Masters!](http://magic.wizards.com/en/articles/archive/news/hascon-and-kickoff-our-25th-anniversary-2017-04-20)
that was actually a good summary
I hate to say it but ugh, the cliche "everything heals with time" is true. In time (different for everyone) you'll move on and you'll be a stronger and more independent person, and as a result you'll be more of your "true self" so the right person will find you. The heartbreak you feel now might stick with you but it kind of evolves into a different kind of hurt - and you might even be grateful that it happened, even if it still kinda stings a little. That heartbreak will go from sobbing and fatigue and feeling hopeless to the same pain you now feel when you remember that time your brother ruined your favorite toy when you were 6, but you grew up and got over it, lol  source: same, but 4 years post-breakup :) you'll be okay! 
Great comments. Thanks for sharing your memories.  I’ve always thought of the Tower of Terror hotel as the “Hotel California” from the song. Creepy Hollywood hotel. Just seems to fit. 
Lol, I just noticed your name. That explains everything!
What is this? Repost directly from the front page hour?
Quite the opposite actually.  I have one main account that I whale on, but things tend to be pretty easy when you have multiple of almost every TMR in the game.  I have two alt accounts that are F2P with some of my best pulls over the past year.  I casually run raids with them, do dailies when I can.  If I am TMRing almost 24/7 with my main, the alt accounts give me something to do while in the bathroom, etc.  The other accounts are there when free tickets come out, compensation lapis, the free 10+1 ticket, simply there to pull units and enjoy a little gambling.  Those accounts don't really do much, but if I have the time to start them all up, I will do the free pulls this month. I really enjoy re-rolling on occasion because of the lottery element to it.  I simply keep those accounts in Memu and boot them up every so often.
Indiana? I think you need to take a look at a map friend...   Also: implying that only people in the deep south can be absolute fucking idiots is really a shallow view to take when looking at the thalassic well of human stupidity
I've heard that about Bangkok - I was just giving myself wiggle-room for Jetlag. I've been told that it might be worth heading to Koh Toa a bit early, as it's worth checking out, regardless of diving. I'm pretty set on Chiang Mai now., no-one has suggested that Phucket is anything more than more beaches. Auckland is the first stop at the start of my 1 year working Visa :)   I can't wait!
To be fair I've seen this guy get so many trash elite packs I can say he kinda deserves pack luck like that for once 
Thank you, /u/weiher69! You have awarded karma to user /u/C4st3ll4nos.  --Moderators of /r/pumparum
Trump made fun of a lady who got a face lift and said she was bleeding. It's on Twitter, as usual 
You are not alone. If someday i pull up an Artamiel, i'm gonna feed him just for revenge.
Well that's unfortunate (i'm going with a 1600 so hopefully I dodged the issue, but OP may have to deal with it)
what is a cashing server? how does this help at lans? im going to on thise weekend!
All these confirm that I either like highly abstract/stylized covers or ones that feature a super wide angle. I skim over all the covers with mid or close shots or just pictures of weapons. 
The CVs primary duty is to give eyes to the fleet and kill enemy battleships.  Yes this overspecialization really harms the versatility a good CV driver can bring, but if everyone is doing their job, it's not a problem. You can still scout DDs, you just can't kill them. You shouldn't be picking fights with CAs anyway.  I think Enterprise could be better, but in the right fleet she'll do well. If and when we get clan matches, I wonder if she'll see a lot of use.
Yes, like 80-90% coals 
He doesn't need proof. It's the job of the police to investigate and find the proof.
Funny how every single one of Trump's buddies is a corrupt peice of shit.  Can't wait until our orange scumbag gets what's coming to him.
Good stuff.  Hope he bounces back this year, should at the very least make training camp more competitive/interesting.
I'm famous!
Yes, that was more or less how my decision tree went.  Shit wasn't going well so I decided to not make it worse in *every* way.  Thank you, I appreciate your feedback!!  Great job losing your 60 pounds!  Keep up the hard work!
Also try brie.. with some fruit and/or nuts.
I thought R/L would be better since 7c awakenings (idk Shiva's damage), but it would be hard to balance damage
Talking to an adult is your best choice.
I mean, I guess he's a bit of an upgrade but not really a big one... Teague confuses me  Should I feel differently?
Which way out though?
I'M A BIT LATE WITH NOTHING REALLY TO COMPLAIN ABOUT OTHER THAN I MADE THE MISTAKE OF SAYING DW OUT LOUD AND MY MIND WENT TO DEE W FROM ARTHUR. I CAN'T UNHEAR THIS.
My Inquisitor doesn't even sleep there. When Dorian's says, "Have you been to your quarters lately?" he's like, "What? Where are they?"
Tigers don't marry
Added 
Yes
Wondered when I'd find this comment.
Just a note there is a bug with creating a guest account atm. I'm uploading a fix and eta is 10 minutes (my net is slow)  Edit: Fix is out and confirmed working
Sorry, I meant can't.  So your problem is with a matter of how impressive the fight is?  It doesn't matter. High level PvP is about dodging, predcting, avoiding getting hit, punishing. Not about dealing a high amount of hits. Again, if you want PvP with long fights, go low level. You just complain for the sake of complaining.
That could lead to sometimes fiery, sometimes friendly rivalries, especially early on. As societies develop, I suspect it would become more friendly the closer you came to modern time. What kind of vegetables/fruits do Minotaurs eat? Eih-Curs are especially fond of cabbage, lettuce, and onions.
I don't think any of us realized they could live so long. He's literally been there since before I was born. When I look at old pictures I laugh because I see him in the background. 
America needs to be big news.
Yeah i know that dumb shit but the actual dudes running the site
Good Lord!  Those breasts are beautiful.
Abandon all hope, Abandon all love
ship it like fedex
I don't like this.  Mills is a lame duck. Yes, I'm sure he's respected around the league but what has he actually done? Masai made the Raptors relevant. Presti drafted 3 superstars. Griffin constructed a roster around the best player in the world that went to the finals 3 years in a row.  In all his time with the Knicks, what tangible thing has Mills done? And why choose someone who hasn't actually done anything, yet again, when better options are staring us in the face?
Lol thats the cost of the pc i built. Wow really hope i get lucky
Username checks out 
I'm fairly certain I went to college with your high school friend...
[you might try this tutorial](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=2zjw1V_qhlk)
This...
Can't Trump just pardon whoever for their contempt of court? 
I mean he could die, like, today.
Confirmed 
That's not a "clitorises", it's her clitoral hood. 
TSM Fans: Bjergsen is the best mid NA  Jensen: BjERgSeN iS tHe bEsT mID nA
I said "no, not really" in response to you claiming I said it never happened. Learn context.
Funny enough "one upping" is also in the comments. 
The entire Beyond Closet I Love Pet line because everything is improved by the addition of dogs!
OMG you were so freaking adorable - still cute ofc
Hopefully it will. 
gee...
Are you asking about the Japanese internment camps in the United States? Or camps run by the Japanese on mainland China?
Hey Goddspeed. Thanks for your submission in /r/hmmm!  Unfortunately, your submission has been removed for the following reason(s):  * Not hmmm enough --------------------  * [Here is the removal faq](https://www.reddit.com/r/hmmm/wiki/rules)  * [Link to message the entire mod team (read faq first)](https://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2Fhmmm)
Can anyone else see an obvious political motivation? Kick the enemy while they're down?  And last I checked she is far right in the same way that the thumb of your left hand is when held palm down.
Yup. 
They are gunna show up to work even though they loose money? Thats when crime and being in a gang becomes more appealing because you are literally on the brink of starving to death.  And ethics matter because a society operates better when there isn't massive inequality and resentment by a large group within the population. Labour disputes used to often get violent and fatal 100 years ago. Workers need legal protection.  Also its not worth a persons time in a developed country to do a simple manufacturing job that can be done where the cost of living and cost manufacturing is low. Also I don't see McDonalds moving to Poland and shipping burgers. We need to rely on advanced industries, not simple unskilled labour.   It couldn't hurt to make changes in society to reduce population increases among lower income people, but increasing inequality does more harm then good.
BBs are OP and have only ever had 2 minor nerfs (flooding and this).
**Here's a sneak peek of /r/FreeGamesOnSteam using the [top posts](https://np.reddit.com/r/FreeGamesOnSteam/top/?sort=top&amp;t=year) of the year!**  \#1: [\[Steam\] (Game) Payday 2](http://store.steampowered.com/app/218620/?free) | [133 comments](https://np.reddit.com/r/FreeGamesOnSteam/comments/6g2wmx/steam_game_payday_2/)   \#2: [DiRT 3](https://www.humblebundle.com/store/dirt-3-complete-edition-free-game) | [117 comments](https://np.reddit.com/r/FreeGamesOnSteam/comments/5c9ach/dirt_3/)   \#3: [GRID™](https://www.humblebundle.com/store/grid-free-game?utm_source=Twitter&amp;utm_medium=Link&amp;utm_campaign=Humble_Store_Tweets) | [97 comments](https://np.reddit.com/r/FreeGamesOnSteam/comments/5jrzw9/grid/)  ---- ^^I'm ^^a ^^bot, ^^beep ^^boop ^^| ^^Downvote ^^to ^^remove ^^| [^^Contact ^^me](https://www.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=sneakpeekbot) ^^| [^^Info](https://np.reddit.com/r/sneakpeekbot/) ^^| [^^Opt-out](https://np.reddit.com/r/sneakpeekbot/comments/5lveo6/blacklist/)
Hello, [flameduck](/u/flameduck). It looks like you referenced jacksfilms without making a forehead joke.   Please correct your comment and include a forehead joke. Thank you.
We can't keep him at 20 mil a year but we most definitely still need him.   He provided every spark we needed to our two most recent trophies and he does a lot of the work with the young guys on our team. He is the most level headed one they call an adult in the room.  On top of that, Steph and KD said they would take less to make sure he can get brought back on.   Any warriors fan saying we don't need iggy is really in denial IMHO. 
**Please review the rules for [Joke &amp; Humor Posts](https://www.reddit.com/r/nfl/wiki/rules_detail#wiki_joke_.26amp.3B_humor_posts).**  **Joke &amp; Humor Posts** These are low effort submissions that are posted primarily for their humor and provide no meaningful substance.  * **Not Allowed** * *Reaction gifs* - [Example](http://imgur.com/BTsCm8g) * *AdviceAnimal Images* - [Example](http://i.imgur.com/GucoZLP.jpg) * *Memes/Comics* - [Example](http://i.imgur.com/2W2NQ5a.jpg) * *Satire* - [Example](http://i.imgur.com/kZsXRPI.jpg) * *Text Humor/Joke* - [Example](http://imgur.com/Zoy2b1n.jpg) * *etc.*  **Follow [Reddiquette](http://www.reddit.com/wiki/reddiquette)** - When posting/voting.  *User feedback is the best way to help improve this sub, so please don't hesitate to [send us a message](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2Fnfl), if you have any questions on the rules, or how they are applied.*
I like how he ignores this comment lol. But it's not fair other people have cooler looking hats! XD
If you are going for emptying your hand, [[burning Inquiry]] helps just load you with discard triggers and can randomly disrupt your opponents plans.
go away
Unrestrained pets are the number three cause of fatal car accidents in my state. The pet jumps, the driver swerves to react, they crash. A harness connected to the seatbelt system or a proper pet carrier is what's recommended. Realistically, people just let their dogs bounce all around the car though.
Pretty soon after - less than a week in my experience. Also, not sure if this is helpful, miles posted after companion code for me.
Hell no! Pet Sounds is my second favorite song on the album!
Your parents need to take a high school Economics 101 class.  The law of supply and demand is pretty basic.
Roseville trash
Armored unit in Awakening whose thing was, no one notices or sees him.
&gt;waow
This was a good one. Three Starch Lords, a Lily and two Garlic, and that didn't win. Two Warlords, two Defensive Ends, two Sport Coaches, and *that* didn't win. It ended around turn 14 when I got Leaf Blower from Photosynthesiser, bounced a Defensive End and let Bananasaurus hit face for 16.
I had just bought Guitar Hero and was playing it at home. The guitar's front surface was very smooth, slick plastic. I had applied one of the included stickers onto it - a large Skull &amp; Crossbones. As I played the guitar, the sticker slowly slid off the guitar and onto my shorts. I didn't realise, and *went to the shops like that*. Noticed a lot of people giving me strange looks. On my way back to the car, I suddenly realised I had been walking around amongst hundreds of people with a fucking skull and crossbones decoration right exactly front-n-center on the crotch of my pants.
Also I don't know how to make small text and refuse to learn so I'll just put [Joke] here.
It's for blind people, they read by feeling the raised bumps.
What's the income limit? I'm very close to making 100k annually so I am worried it would affect my ability to get assistance. My insurance also denied coverage :( I am also enrolled in MyWay and they mentioned they would cover $13k with copay card, but I'll need to call them back to see if they can provide more assistance after getting news of the denial. 
That's not an argument. It's a logical fallacy
ye, but PRANK GONE WRONG (IN THE HOOD) (COPS CALLED) (TRIANGLE STUCK IN BODY) (ALMOST DIED)
Why can't they latch onto men? It's a valid strategy, and it's worked. 
He's 27 
Jaa, oma kokemukseni on varsin toisenlainen. Varsinkin finanssimatikan tai stokan linjalaiset työllistyy aivan helvetin hyvin ja hyvällä palkallakin.
Can anyone clarify what a yoga set is? Is it literally a chill set aimed at doing yoga to?
It just ain't the Coca-Pepsi 400 without last lap PRAWBLEMS
Except there will be a new, probably large patch before TI so that makes no sense?
Hi there- I received mine a quite a few weeks ago for the Friday Hammersmith Apollo show. Maybe this is unusual, idk
seems like u converted it for a name change, not membership
I don't care for this at all. He's been hurt most of the season, didn't show up last finals and hasn't really been relevant at all. 
I considered Slothberry (again, the name drew me in), but I'm not big on "candy" flavours and I was worried it might be one. I also find that raspberry flavours have a tendency to be on the dry end, at least the few I've tried. Maybe next time I'll be a little more adventurous. 
I'd like to see one, but I'm sure of the possibility of another MT being added. 
C'mon Minnesota, you can do better
So your entire argument is that Lonzo cannot get a contract with Nike/Adidas now that he has signed with BBB. Correct?   Why don't you make a thread about that question so that everyone can agree with you since I'm such a moron?
What.
I swear I only drink 1 coffee each day!  Ok... It's 2 
How real men TP back in the day. 
W
I've never heard a good answer to this question that makes sense, so there must be something I'm missing. Why pay Fifty Grand to do what others do for free? All I can speculate is that there's something about the price tag and the service given that makes it worth it. Some of the more costly practices offer to bring over any family that you left behind, over X amount of years - so maybe?
I'm not going to say I wish you didn't exist cuz thats mean.. but every time I see you comment, I wish I hadn't existed to read it. 
glad someone dropped him in my league. The hit he allowed in the 2nd should of been an error too.
Ah yes, I can't beat them under normal circumstances so I'll just play a killer that has no counter.  Why try to play the game when you can just win, right? 
Big clue that he's not well.  This is not normal ppl behaviour. 
Like who? Call of the dead was the only map. But then again I can kinda see your point. But doing an Easter egg and unlocking a fifth character to play as is something treyarch has never done before 
That's why we have one of the best academy programs in the country. 
Loving the textures seems like smeared pastel or oil.
That's terrible and I'm sorry you had to experience that. People are just so shitty. 
I'm afraid that's a question I'll need more time to answer. I had a bunch of free time yesterday, but not enough today. I'll mull it over and get back to you when I've got a free hour or so.  RemindMe! 2 days
Yeah but you said steaks.
 Here is my information on /u/IgrewAtomato:  [/u/IgrewAtomato has taken out and paid back 1 loans, for a total of $25.00](/paid_)  [/u/IgrewAtomato has given out and gotten returned 1117 loans, for a total of $172421.75](/paid_)  [Loans unpaid with /u/IgrewAtomato as a borrower:](/unpaid_)  Lender|Borrower|Amount Given|Amount Repaid|Unpaid?|Original Thread|Date Given|Date Paid Back :--|:--|:--|:--|:--|:--|:--|:--  [Loans unpaid with /u/IgrewAtomato as a lender:](/unpaid_)  Lender|Borrower|Amount Given|Amount Repaid|Unpaid?|Original Thread|Date Given|Date Paid Back :--|:--|:--|:--|:--|:--|:--|:-- IgrewAtomato|bycisnet|150.00|0.00|***UNPAID***|[Original Thread](https://www.reddit.com/r/borrow/comments/5xtwx8/req_150_apopka_fl_usa_31817_paypalbank_deposit/)|Mar 8, 2017| IgrewAtomato|gayfarang|250.00|0.00|***UNPAID***|[Original Thread](https://www.reddit.com/r/borrow/comments/5iscyb/req_250_bangkok_bangkok_thailand_300_repaid_on/)|Dec 16, 2016| IgrewAtomato|achmeineye|200.00|0.00|***UNPAID***|[Original Thread](https://www.reddit.com/r/borrow/comments/5irjh3/req_200_gary_indiana_usa_11917_paypal/)|Dec 16, 2016|  - + An additional 44 older loans (a total of $8104.74 lent) that were truncated  In-progress loans with /u/IgrewAtomato as a lender:  Lender|Borrower|Amount Given|Amount Repaid|Unpaid?|Original Thread|Date Given|Date Paid Back :--|:--|:--|:--|:--|:--|:--|:-- IgrewAtomato|dymphna_Rose|700.00|0.00||[Original Thread](https://www.reddit.com/r/borrow/comments/6kj59s/req_700_woodstock_vt_usa_july_10th/)|Jun 30, 2017| IgrewAtomato|TyBoogie|300.00|0.00||[Original Thread](https://www.reddit.com/r/borrow/comments/6khkzj/req_300_new_york_ny_usa_repay_350_on_7072017/)|Jun 30, 2017| IgrewAtomato|writeandknow|330.00|0.00||[Original Thread](https://www.reddit.com/r/borrow/comments/6k5g2w/req_330_dayton_ohio_usa_august_31st_paypal/)|Jun 30, 2017| IgrewAtomato|midnightauro|100.00|0.00||[Original Thread](https://www.reddit.com/r/borrow/comments/6kcmlg/req_100_shelby_nc_usa_772017_prearranged/)|Jun 29, 2017| IgrewAtomato|Jaslyne|150.00|0.00||[Original Thread](https://www.reddit.com/r/borrow/comments/6k7f3z/req_150_el_mirage_az_usa_7142017_paypal/)|Jun 29, 2017| IgrewAtomato|Lovebeautynglam|150.00|0.00||[Original Thread](https://www.reddit.com/r/borrow/comments/6k865f/req_150_usd_browns_mills_nj_payback_175_in_by_aug/)|Jun 29, 2017| IgrewAtomato|Icemajor|350.00|0.00||[Original Thread](https://www.reddit.com/r/borrow/comments/6k45ot/req_350_pendleton_sc_usa_7172017_paypal_or_bank/)|Jun 28, 2017| IgrewAtomato|Poor_White_Guy|200.00|0.00||[Original Thread](https://www.reddit.com/r/borrow/comments/6k3gyx/req_20000_baltimore_md_usa_712_726_prearranged/)|Jun 28, 2017| IgrewAtomato|smechile|120.00|0.00||[Original Thread](https://www.reddit.com/r/borrow/comments/6k2ocy/req_120_columbia_mo_us_135_repaid_on_july_7_2017/)|Jun 28, 2017| IgrewAtomato|fusionx13|200.00|0.00||[Original Thread](https://www.reddit.com/r/borrow/comments/6ju6qm/req_200_lansing_mi_usa_07142017_paypalprearranged/)|Jun 27, 2017| IgrewAtomato|Vekter|250.00|0.00||[Original Thread](https://www.reddit.com/r/borrow/comments/6jovxk/req_250300_huntsville_al_us_082017_paypal/)|Jun 26, 2017| IgrewAtomato|antcruz|600.00|0.00||[Original Thread](https://www.reddit.com/r/borrow/comments/6jncx9/req_600_sunnyvale_california_repay_700_on_july_15/)|Jun 26, 2017| IgrewAtomato|humdingeries|40.00|0.00||[Original Thread](https://www.reddit.com/r/borrow/comments/6jjt1v/req_40_dundee_uk_repay_10th_july_paypal/)|Jun 26, 2017| IgrewAtomato|feelsjustlike|75.00|0.00||[Original Thread](https://www.reddit.com/r/borrow/comments/6jkpfm/req_75_st_johns_nl_canada_july_28_etransfer/)|Jun 26, 2017| IgrewAtomato|tryshapepper|50.00|0.00||[Original Thread](https://www.reddit.com/r/borrow/comments/6jh90k/reqhouston_tx_usa50paypal63017/)|Jun 25, 2017| IgrewAtomato|llamas_theory|150.00|0.00||[Original Thread](https://www.reddit.com/r/borrow/comments/6jg6wr/req_150_10_interest_hull_uk_paypal_07_07/)|Jun 25, 2017| IgrewAtomato|Daedus|200.00|0.00||[Original Thread](https://www.reddit.com/r/borrow/comments/6jgwg0/req_200_jaffrey_nh_usa_220_on_july_10th_paypal/)|Jun 25, 2017| IgrewAtomato|TheDoober110|500.00|0.00||[Original Thread](https://www.reddit.com/r/borrow/comments/6jdwsh/req_500_st_albans_vt_us_629_713_and_poss_727/)|Jun 25, 2017| IgrewAtomato|SuspendedInTheAir|100.00|0.00||[Original Thread](https://www.reddit.com/r/borrow/comments/6jah8p/req_100_old_bridge_nj_usa_0627_0711/)|Jun 24, 2017| IgrewAtomato|anitxtina|350.00|0.00||[Original Thread](https://www.reddit.com/r/borrow/comments/6j4mc2/req_350_northridge_ca_usa_83117_paypal/)|Jun 23, 2017|  - + An additional 61 older loans (a total of $17479.00 lent) that were truncated  In-progress loans with /u/IgrewAtomato as borrower:  Lender|Borrower|Amount Given|Amount Repaid|Unpaid?|Original Thread|Date Given|Date Paid Back :--|:--|:--|:--|:--|:--|:--|:-- [search](http://www.reddit.com/r/Loans+borrow/search?q=IgrewAtomato&amp;restrict_sr=on&amp;sort=new&amp;t=all), [reddit investigator](http://redditinvestigator.com/IgrewAtomato), [justin paulin creddit rating](http://justinpaulin.com/tools/credditrating.php?username=IgrewAtomato)
Maybe he's the guy who lives below the couple that's very passionate about making loud noises for their downstairs neighbor I saw once on TV. Or not.  /s
Happy Birthday bb😘
whoa
[](/ppboring)I just wanna fuck a poner as a poner.
Don't worry the glock is easy to find, but the groza might take you a while, you'll be better of ambushing people as they move from an airdrop than going for it yourself!
Yep, I was a clicker at first. Had a hard time switching to keybinds until I got the multibutton mouse. It took a few months to get used to but now I run 54 different combinations on it. Just takes practice.
I'll be honest. I'll quit a game early if I run into someone who runs nothing but edge blitzes and blitzes that the fucking line refuses to slide to. Or people who run those fucked up plays where they come out in tight formation. I can't defend that formation for my life.
Sometimes I have hope in humanity. Sometimes. Then this happens.
This so sounds like the sort of thing that Southampton were bitching about in the first place...
I get it
Hey there!  This is a friendly reminder that your BTFC 9    completion date is coming up soon. Please check your [competitor entry page](http://btfc9.rohitnair.net/competitors/notagooduname)    for the exact date, and make sure you submit your completion post on time. After submitting    the post, you will need to upload valid photos, so it is highly recommended that    you make your post well in advance of your deadline, so that you have time to correct    any errors that the mods find.
You asked the question just fine. He was just joking. 
This comment has been redacted, join /r/zeronet/ to avoid censorship + /r/guifi/
Nice pigtails, reminds me of Ulala from that sega game
Liberal exposure. Most people don't want illegals here.
If he's in college, that makes him like 18-22ish?  So I'm going to assume she's 14 or younger unless you tell me otherwise.  Also, why are you friends with 14 year old girls?
700 is quite dead since there are bots and new players that will prolly quit soonn, the new phRO is wayy more populated and fun
Not watching. What makes you say that
Just as well Nintendo get buy by people buying software. That aint going to help if people aint got shit to play it on though is it.  I fear the SNES classic will be as rare as rocking horse shit.
The winter is very wet and very quiet here. Traffic ,what little we have in the summer, is cut like 60% so the main drag is pretty quiet. Many of the store shut and board up for the winter. I have an inside job so the rain really doesn't bother me. We had a rough winter this year, got 14 inches of snow one night, which is a bunch here. But there is a bunch of depression here in the winter to, no sunlight.   Yeah they got right on that dock repair. Had it fixed in 2 weeks I think, maybe 3.
That is your choice, but the natives are getting restless. We have to find a way to clean everything up because we can't continue on this path. 
The LED Fans😯😩
He also was a depressed person during his life
I could be wrong but I'm pretty sure the missions do NOT count. This is not for any missions, this is for vouchers, which means random WANTED encounters you run into from scanning someone who is wanted then killing them. Go to a res site and start scanning people. I turned in one voucher that was only worth 13000 credits and was immediately in the 100 percentile.
You take your dog to the fucking vet right now. 
Lol Carter was DFA's but is back up due to injury. Also Springer laughing and hugging Carter was adorable.
Twins v Royals at The Moving Pictures: [SD, ads: 1, mobile: yes!](http://themoving.pictures/stream-twins-royals)
That could just be how Cersei perceived things. Doesn't mean it's a fact, but I do think Tywin loved Jaime the most. Or at least liked him the most.
I'm in for slot two 
Thanks I'll do that!
Money and lack of empathy, plus hyper celebration of rich lifestyles
Study
MCRD Parris Island
nice, good luck everyone
You're absolutely right. Kind of thought to myself that it was funny to have a 1.25" tee on a small tank but there it is. To OP: a 0.75" tee and nipple is what you will need. Good eye, /u/slowtdi
Ok, this explains his recent behaviour
All of which are more effective with a trained adult in the room. Hence the encouragement to avoid homework, and instead have them wrestle with the work in the classroom, where they can immediate feedback.
How is the new Trouble? Haven't had time to listen yet
I sexually identify as WAAAAAAAAAAAAA
I've had this happen before. I know that in my situation, after a few times of her not texting me back, I just tried to put it out of my mind for a bit. She eventually texted me again.
Damn, he was, wasn't he? I was ready to defend my boy Luffy but the more I thought about it, he was bodied at Marineford. 
Ssumday had a rough game against Impact and he went from a Reddit favorite for mvp to not even in the conversation.  I'm not even a big fan of Ssumday and never really thought he was a contender, but what the fuck?  Reddit doesn't even have the memory of a goldfish.  I struggle to think of another sub or forum for any (e)sport that has more consistently horrifically bad but wildly popular analysis than r/leagueoflegends
Nice find! Pretty chill Kool &amp; the Gang jazz remix, I like it.
The first two hits of the art are true, the final (and most damaging) hit is not - but a lot of the time, it's worth doing to do just because sometimes they won't roll or they'll try to block or whatever. Regardless, I think it's more damage than two R1s anyway.
Are you a landowner?
Thank you for your submission! Unfortunately, it has been automatically removed because you did not include a question mark "?" in your title. We require post titles to be phrased as questions so that our panelists and visitors can more easily know what each thread is about. Please feel free to re-submit with a title that contains a question mark. Thanks for understanding. :)  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/askscience) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Don't expect him to make an impact this year... he's been battling injury after injury (just hit the DL again with back issues a few weeks ago) and he's been surpassed in the pecking order.  Honeywell has been much better than his 4.91 Triple-A ERA suggests, but TB likes to slow-roast their pitchers so I wouldn't expect him to get the call until September barring injuries.
Ive been expeincing this
Awesome workflow OP!  The song was p. lit as well; sorta matched the vid xD
A única saída é o aeroporto. Você não consegue mudar o país mas mudar de país é bem fácil
Also I saw that comment you deleted [{image}](http://i.imgur.com/fUg2bUg.png).  And my response (that I was typing out before you deleted it): &gt;So you think it's actually more ethical to be forced to exist in a way that will most likely be agonizing, than not to exist at all?  &gt;You seem to be arguing from the position that non-existence is a negative state, when it's as neutral as possible. Ethical concerns cannot apply to something that does not exist.  &gt;Having children at *all* is already an ethically sketchy proposition, but when the deck is about as stacked as possible against any prospective offspring, that tips the scale all the way to 'what the fuck do you think you're doing' territory.
Not over 700 complaints. Over 700 burns. 
To me, it's people like you who stir up shit where there's really no shit to stir up at. Making people second guess themselves and unhappier because of it.   You don't know jack about their relationship, but you talk about servitude. You have absolutely no clue what the husband does in the relationship, he might to absolutely everything else from fixing stuff, having a lot more demanding/harder job that brings in most of the money, taking the kids to school every morning, etc.  You have no idea, but you're still ready to label her as being in servitude.   What you're doing is not only stupid, but it's harmful.
